Pitches for treatments with no scientific proof erode trust and threaten lives.
Fear is overcoming reason as the threat of the coronavirus spreads.
After hearing President Trump say, without scientific evidence, that the antimalarial drug chloroquine could be a “game changer” in the fight against Covid-19, an Arizona man died and his wife was left in critical condition after they swallowed a form of the chemical used to clean fish tanks called chloroquine phosphate.
The same day, a government official reported that three men in Nigeria had overdosed on chloroquine, and warnings against taking this medicine were made public.
As physicians, our advice is based on medical evidence that weighs the benefits of a medicine or treatment against its potential harms, such as a medication’s side effects or a surgical procedure’s complications. This rigorous decision-making is backed by research from peer-reviewed clinical trials, and is subject to government oversight. It’s dangerous for people with no medical license or training or understanding of science to promote the effectiveness of unproven treatments.
The efficacy of chloroquine and its derivatives deserves rapid scientific study, and, rightly, there are ongoing clinical trials. However, the off-label use of these medicines against Covid-19 outside of a monitored clinical trial and without proper cardiac testing, could cause an abnormal heart rhythm and even death. These medications are also used in the long-term treatment of other medical conditions, including lupus and rheumatoid arthritis, and increased use against Covid-19 may lead to shortages for those who need it chronically.
Even more concerning is the increasing number of sham products and nonsense regimens emerging as Covid-19 treatments. Such therapies are pure snake oil, conjuring visions of street corner salesmen telling folks to “step right up” and try their newest elixir.
Interestingly, snake oil itself may not have been a total sham originally. Introduced to America by Chinese railroad workers in the 1800s, it was made from a Chinese water snake whose oil contains high concentrations of omega-3 fatty acids, and may have been effective in treating arthritic pain. As news of this treatment spread, a man named Clark Stanley began selling his own Snake Oil Liniment. While he claimed his balm was made from oil from American rattlesnakes, it reportedly contained no snake oil whatsoever, thus beginning a tradition of medical cons.
The latter half of the 1800s saw a steep rise in the sale of similar unproven treatments, known as “patent medicines,” the purported benefits of which included everything from “lame back” and “contracted cords” to “female problems” and venereal disease. The Pure Food and Drug Act of 1906 signaled the beginning of the end of these patent medicines.
Even now though, products labeled dietary supplements skirt the F.D.A.’s drug regulations by claiming to be food, and therefore not requiring F.D.A. approval to be sold. It is the company’s responsibility to make sure its products are safe and that any claims are true, not the F.D.A.’s. Everyone should be very wary of dietary supplement health claims, particularly those claims of miraculous immunity from viral threats. A vivid example can be understood from the following fictional conversation:
In the movie “Contagion,” about a fictional epidemic, a character played by Jude Law peddles a false cure called Forsythia during an interview with Dr. Sanjay Gupta, saying it’s known to be effective even though it doesn’t appear on the website of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
“On your blog you also wrote that the World Health Organization is somehow in bed with pharmaceutical companies,” Dr. Gupta says.
“Because they are,” the charlatan responds. “That’s who stands to gain from this. They’re working hand in glove.”
Claims like that are common among conspiracy theorists, and they’re particularly dangerous at a time when people are looking for sources of hope and someone they can trust — and both are in short supply.
But these untested and unproven treatments, often promoted on social media, may be toxic. Examples circulating online include drinking household bleach and using cocaine. Other recommendations for killing the virus, like gargling vinegar, eating garlic, or using a hairdryer to blow hot air into your nose, hurt people by providing a false sense of security. If a person believes that garlic or vinegar prevents infection, they are more likely to take part in risky behavior that may ultimately get them infected with the virus.
The government is recognizing the growing risk from snake oil salesmen. The F.B.I. has made its first arrestfor fraud, charging a man who has 2.4 million Instagram followers with selling pills he said could cure or prevent Covid-19. The New York State attorney general issued a cease and desist letter against the televangelist Jim Bakker, who is also being sued by the state of Missouri for falsely claiming his Silver Solution could cure Covid-19.
“The pandemic is dangerous enough without wrongdoers seeking to profit from public panic and this sort of conduct cannot be tolerated,” Attorney General William Barr stated in a memo to federal prosecutors.
These prosecutions against snake oil salesmen should be swift and severe.
And you need to help yourself: If you read or see something online or on TV that purports to prevent or cure Covid-19, go to reputable resources such as the C. D.C., which provide evidence-based recommendations. Do not take the practice of medicine into your own hands, seek guidance from physicians who care about you.
Jaes Phillips is an assistant professor of emergency medicine, and fellowship director and chief, of disaster and operational medicine at the George Washington University School of Medicine and Health Sciences, as well as senior fellow at the Center for Cyber and Homeland Security at Auburn University. Jordan Selzer, Samantha Noll and Timur Alptunaer are disaster and operational medicine fellows at George Washington University.





We run a suburban medical office, not a front-line emergency room. But the lack of protective gear also affects us, and the people who need us.
Over 12 days ago, when I walked into my otolaryngology office in Westchester County, N.Y., my office manager gave me one high-grade N-95 mask. These masks are not supposed to be reusable, but somehow I had to make it last: We didn’t have any more. I later learned that we only had 25 protective gowns — likewise designed to be single-use items — for an office of nine medical specialists. When I saw a delivery of protective medical equipment in our building the next day, I assumed it was for my office. Instead it was going to the lawyers’ office down the hall. We are finally getting 20 more masks, but our shortage remains acute.
We are not emergency room doctors, swamped by coronavirus-related cases while dangerously short on protective gear. But my colleagues and I, like doctors in thousands of other medical offices, provide vital care that patients need regardless of the pandemic. We may be exposing ourselves every day to Covid-19.
While the need to help hospitals and emergency rooms takes priority, practices that provide care and advice to patients, and act to triage those who might otherwise head to emergency rooms, cannot be ignored. How will the system treat asthma, chest pain, chemotherapy needs, orthopedic injuries or even a severe bloody nose if the emergency rooms are overburdened? Routine care could start to break down.
I have been in contact with a member of a hospital medical board, the president of a New York state medical association and medical providers across the country for over four weeks. We all feel that from the beginning of this crisis, the authorities’ inability to provide adequate information about dealing with the virus, or adequate protection to confront it, has left us adrift — threatening our health and our patients’ care.
From the beginning, we have faced many unanswered questions and paradoxes.
When we heard federal officials say that test kits would be forthcoming, we asked, How can we test if there is no protective gear available? If testing is problematic and needs to be rationed, what are the priority cases? Those questions have still not been clearly answered.
In a public health alert sent Saturday morning, the Westchester County health department said the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention determined that N-95 masks “are no longer required” to perform Covid-19 diagnostic tests. That memo, though, provides a link to a C.D.C. page that says N-95 masks should be worn during testing. Masks matter because, at the moment, only people with symptoms of Covid-19 are being tested at all — so the chances are that anyone performing the test could get infected, since the process involves a swab deep into the nasal passage and can send the virus into the air.
Recently, the New York City health department told medical providers that even if they had a high-risk exposure to a patient later found to have the coronavirus they should continue to work as long as they are symptom free, and not quarantine themselves as previous guidance had recommended. These recommendations are the opposite of the sort of social distancing that state officials are recommending for everyone else. (I just found out that on March 11 I saw a patient who has been hospitalized with Covid-19, so I am staying home.)
The state has also asked retired physicians to volunteer to help patients. Given how vulnerable to Covid-19 people age 70 and over seem to be, how sensible is that? Especially if returning physicians work without adequate protection?
The questions are endless, the answers not very satisfying and there is a growing fear among the soldiers in this battle.
This week, of 534 doctors in family, pediatric and internal medicine responding to a survey, almost half said their offices had little or no protective equipment, a fifth faced staff shortages because of illness and half said Covid-19 had a severe or close to severe impact on their practices.
Some of our needs are being addressed. Regulations in telemedicine are being streamlined so we can adopt it more quickly and widely.
Still, one large local medical practice has closed down eight of their 11 offices in New York State because they don’t have enough protective equipment to cover them all.
Short and long term, the prospects for providers — and their patients — are daunting. Individual health care workers and their employees have been thrust into leadership positions and made to navigate an ever-changing situation.
Health care providers are charging into a combat zone without support. We need dependable sources of information that can quickly answer our questions about testing, treatment, equipment and patient care. We need the government to ensure that we are provided adequate protection now. We need partners in leadership to do our jobs in this crisis.
Frank Shechtman is an otolaryngologist and emeritus section chief in the division of otolaryngology at White Plains Hospital Medical Center, in White Plains, N.Y.




Will we endure 2.2 million deaths? Or will we manage to turn things around?
Here's the grimmest version of life a year from now: More than two million Americans have died from the new coronavirus, almost all mourned without funerals. Countless others have died because hospitals are too overwhelmed to deal adequately with heart attacks, asthma and diabetic crises. The economy has cratered into a depression, for fiscal and monetary policy are ineffective when people fear going out, businesses are closed and tens of millions of people are unemployed. A vaccine still seems far off, immunity among those who have recovered proves fleeting and the coronavirus has joined the seasonal flu as a recurring peril.
Yet here's an alternative scenario for March 2021: Life largely returned to normal by the late summer of 2020, and the economy has rebounded strongly. The United States used a sharp, short shock in the spring of 2020 to break the cycle of transmission; warm weather then reduced new infections and provided a summer respite for the Northern Hemisphere. By the second wave in the fall, mutations had attenuated the coronavirus, many people were immune and drugs were shown effective in treating it and even in reducing infection. Thousands of Americans died, mostly octogenarians and nonagenarians and some with respiratory conditions, but by February 2021, vaccinations were introduced worldwide and the virus was conquered.
The Best Case
I've been speaking to epidemiologists about their best- and worst-case scenarios to gauge what may lie ahead and see how we can tilt the balance. Let me start with the best case, since we could all use a dose of hope -- which may even be therapeutic -- before presenting a bleaker prognosis.
''The best case is that the virus mutates and actually dies out,'' said Dr. Larry Brilliant, an epidemiologist who as a young doctor was part of the fight to eradicate smallpox. Brilliant was a consultant for the movie ''Contagion,'' in which a virus evolved to become more deadly, but that's the exception. ''Only in movies do viruses seem to become worse,'' he explained.
Two other lethal coronaviruses, SARS and MERS, both petered out, and that is possible here. ''My hope is that Covid-19 will not survive,'' said Dr. Charles G. Prober, a professor at Stanford Medical School.
Several countries have shown that decisive action can turn the tide on Covid-19, at least for a time. China, astonishingly, on Thursday reported not a single new case of domestic transmission. While China is still vulnerable to a second wave, it has apparently shown that the virus can be squelched.
The West isn't going to copy the coercive tactics of China, but Singapore, Taiwan, South Korea and Hong Kong have also demonstrated that, at least temporarily, the virus can be controlled.
Singapore and the other successful Asian models responded with the standard epidemiological tool kit: vigilance and rapid response, testing, isolating the sick, tracing contacts, quarantining those exposed, ensuring social distancing and providing reliable information. They did not shut down their entire countries, and Singapore managed to keep its schools open throughout.
''Singapore is a best-case scenario,'' said Dr. Tom Frieden, a former director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. He said that there was some possibility that with social distancing and limits on gatherings, the United States could knock down the numbers of infections and begin to adopt Singapore-style strategies to reduce new infections.
''The most important lesson is that the virus can be contained if people are responsible and adhere to certain simple principles,'' said Dr. Christopher Willis, a physician in Singapore. ''Stay calm. For most people it's like the common cold.''
Dr. Tom Inglesby, an expert on pandemics at the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health, said, ''The fact that Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, South Korea and China -- and to some extent Japan -- have all flattened their curves despite having the initial onslaught of cases should give us some hope that we can sort out what they're doing well and emulate it.''
One encouraging sign is that in Washington State, which had an early outbreak, the number of positive tests appears stable.
The weather may also help us. Some respiratory viruses decline in summer from a combination of higher temperatures and people not being huddled together, so it is possible that Northern Hemisphere nations will enjoy a summer break before a second wave in the fall. That's what happened during the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic: It hit in the spring of 1918, went away but returned worse than ever in the fall.
Of the four coronaviruses that cause the common cold, two diminish in warm weather, while two are more variable. SARS and MERS did not have clear seasonal variations, and even seasonal flu is transmitted in the summer, although less than in winter. So while experts hope that hot weather will shortly bring a reprieve from the coronavirus -- the flu is already on the retreat -- there's no solid evidence.
One reason for measured optimism is the prospect that antiviral medicines will beat the coronavirus; some are already in clinical trials. Scientists have hopes for remdesivir, originally developed for Ebola; chloroquine, an old anti-malaria drug; and some anti-H.I.V. and immune-boosting drugs. Many other drugs are also lined up for trials.
Even without proven treatment, the coronavirus may be less lethal than was originally feared, so long as health care systems are not overwhelmed. In South Korea and in China outside Hubei Province, about 0.8 percent of those known to be infected died, and the rate was 0.6 percent on a cruise ship.
That's still roughly six times the rate of seasonal flu, about 0.1 percent, but Dr. John Ioannidis of Stanford University argues that the fatality rate may end up even lower. He warns that we are engaging in hugely disruptive interventions without firm evidence of the threat that the virus poses. Singapore has had more than 200 confirmed cases of the virus and not a single death.
About four out of five people known to have had the virus had only mild symptoms, and even among those older than 90 in Italy, 78 percent survived. Two-thirds of those who died in Italy had pre-existing medical conditions and were also elderly; Dr. David L. Katz, the former director of the Prevention Research Center at Yale University, notes that many might have died soon of other causes even if the coronavirus had not struck.
That said, a new C.D.C. study finds that of coronavirus cases in the United States requiring admission to the intensive care unit, nearly half involved patients under age 65; there is also concern about lasting lung damage among survivors.
Putting it all together, Dr. Tara C. Smith, an epidemiologist at Kent State University, said: ''I'm not pessimistic. I think this can work.'' She thinks it will take eight weeks of social distancing to have a chance to slow the virus, and success will depend on people changing behaviors and on hospitals not being overrun. ''If warm weather helps, if we can get these drugs, if we can get companies to produce more ventilators, we have a window to tamp this down,'' Smith said.
So that's the best case, and it's plausible. If you want to feel upbeat, stop reading here.
The Worst Case
Now we get to the other end of the range of possibilities. Dr. Neil M. Ferguson, a British epidemiologist who is regarded as one of the best disease modelers in the world, produced a sophisticated model with a worst case of 2.2 million deaths in the United States.
I asked Ferguson for his best case. ''About 1.1 million deaths,'' he said.
When that's a best-case scenario, it's difficult to feel optimistic.
Ferguson questions whether South Korea and other countries can sustain their success for 18 months until a vaccine is ready, even as new cases are constantly being imported. Indeed, a burst of new cases has been reported in recent days in Singapore, Hong Kong and Taiwan.
As for the hope that the United States can emulate Singapore or South Korea, that may be a leap.
America and South Korea reported their first Covid-19 cases on the same day, but South Korea took the epidemic seriously, promptly created an effective test, used it widely and has seen cases go down more than 90 percent from the peak. In contrast, the United States badly bungled testing, and President Trump repeatedly dismissed the coronavirus, saying it was ''totally under control'' and ''will disappear,'' and insisting he wasn't ''concerned at all.'' The United States has still done only a bit more than 10 percent as many tests per capita as Canada, Austria and Denmark.
By some counts, the United States is just eight days behind Italy on a similar trajectory, and it's difficult to see how America can pirouette from the path of Italy to that of South Korea. The United States may already have 100,000 infected citizens -- nobody knows. That's too many to trace. Indeed, one can argue that the U.S. is not only on the same path as Italy but is also less prepared, for America has fewer doctors and hospital beds per capita than Italy does -- and a shorter life expectancy even in the best of times.
Mitre, a nonprofit that does work on health care, calculated that coronavirus cases are doubling more quickly in the United States than in any other country it examined, including Italy and Iran.
The nightmare is a surge that overwhelms the hospital system. A Times colleague, Stuart A. Thompson, and I worked with two epidemiologists to develop an interactive model of the virus that suggested that up to 366,000 I.C.U. beds might be needed in the United States for coronavirus patients at one time, more than 10 times the number available. A Harvard study reached a similar conclusion.
This is an interval of quiet when the United States should be urgently ramping up investment in vaccines and therapies, addressing the severe shortages of medical supplies and equipment, and giving retired physicians and military medics legal authority to practice in a crisis. During World War II, the Ford Motor Company turned out one B-24 bomber every 63 minutes; today, we should be rushing out ventilators and face masks, but there's nothing like the same sense of urgency.
Peter Hotez, an eminent vaccine scientist at Baylor College of Medicine, told me that he and his colleagues have a candidate vaccine for the coronavirus but still haven't been able to line up sufficient funding for clinical trials.
Already there are stunning unmet needs for personal protective equipment. After initial missteps in Wuhan, where the coronavirus was first discovered, China adopted protocols for protective gear that are more rigorous than those in the United States, involving N95 masks and face shields, double gowns, gloves and shoe covers, plus special areas to remove protective clothing -- and all this worked. Not one of the 42,000 health workers sent to Wuhan is known to have become infected with the coronavirus. The United States isn't protecting health workers with the same determination; it seems to be betraying them.
Dr. Irwin Redlener, director of the National Center for Disaster Preparedness at Columbia University, said he had received a phone call from a major Florida hospital that had run out of masks. A doctor wanted to know: Could cloth be used to construct makeshift masks?
The answer: not very well, but it's better than nothing. The need is so acute that the C.D.C. has posted official guidance advising that doctors and nurses ''might use homemade masks (e.g., bandanna, scarf) for care of patients with Covid-19 as a last resort.''
''If people think that a hospital crisis is coming, it's important to know that it's already here,'' Redlener said. ''It's affecting front-line health workers, who are probably the highest risk group. These are like combat troops on the front lines of a war.''
In Italy, 8.3 percent of coronavirus cases involve health workers. A doctor in the Seattle area who is forced to reuse N95 masks told me that she and her colleagues fear that the lack of supplies will be deadly.
''We are all making dying contingency plans at this point just in case,'' she said. ''Wills, backup people to take care of kids, recording bedtime stories.''
In the worst-case scenario, will social services collapse in some areas? Will order fray? Gun sales are increasing, because some people expect chaos and crime.
The United States is in a weaker position than some other countries to confront the virus because it is the only advanced country that doesn't have universal health coverage, and the only one that does not guarantee paid sick leave. With chronic diseases, the burden of these gaps is felt primarily by the poor; with infectious diseases, the burden will be shared by all Americans.
It's Up to Us
So where is the United States headed? Will we endure the worst case, with 2.2 million deaths? Or will we manage to turn things around, with help from summer?
No one knows, so the optimal path forward is to hope for the best while preparing for the worst. Dr. Brilliant, whom I quoted above as hoping that the virus mutates and dies out, also warns that the coronavirus may ''cause global disruption on a scale we have not seen from any epidemic in more than 100 years.''
Outcomes depend in part on us -- and my conversations with experts leave me concerned that we still are not doing enough.
''If anything, we're still underreacting,'' said Dr. Chaz Langelier, an expert on respiratory infections at the University of California at San Francisco. ''In the last week, in terms of public health response and testing, we've maybe gotten to the pace we should have been at a month ago.''
This crisis should be a wake-up call to address long-term vulnerabilities. That means providing universal health coverage and paid sick leave -- and if you think that the coronavirus legislation Trump signed on Wednesday achieves that, think again. It guarantees sick leave to only about one-fifth of private-sector workers. It's a symbol of the inadequacy of America's preparedness.
More broadly, the United States must remedy its health priorities: We pour resources into clinical medicine but neglect public health. What's the difference? If you get lung cancer, surgeons operate to save your life, but public health professionals keep you from smoking in the first place. If you get the coronavirus, a doctor will treat you; public health aims to keep the pandemic from getting near you. The United States has a decentralized and spotty public health system, and it has endured painful budget cuts, yet historically public health has saved more lives than clinical medicine.
We may dodge a bullet this time, but experts have been warning for decades that a killer pandemic will come; typically, they expected an avian flu like the 1918 pandemic rather than a coronavirus. Singapore and South Korea did well this time partly because they had been frightened by SARS and MERS and were vigilant; if we, too, can be scared enough to invest in public health and fix our health care system, then something good can come from this crisis -- and in the long run, that may save lives.
The Big One is approaching, whether now or later, whether we're prepared or not. Dr. Ferguson, the infectious disease modeler who predicted deaths in the United States might reach 2.2 million, came down with a cough and fever a few days ago. He tested positive for the coronavirus.







Why are we OK with old people dying?
''Not just old people: Younger adults are also getting the coronavirus,'' a news network declared on its website last week. The words seemed to suggest that Covid-19 didn't matter much if it was a scourge only among the old.
Even if the headline writer had no such nefarious intent, many people seemed surprised that two-thirds of the Americans known to be infected were under 65, according to the federal Centers for Disease Control, and that younger adults around the country also have become critically ill. After all, we kept hearing that 80 percent of the infected Chinese who died were age 60 and older and that the average age of death from the disease in Italy is 81.
No one wants young people to die. So why are we OK with old people dying?
Of course, we all will die, and since the ventures of the rich and famous to indefinitely extend life have so far come up short, death in old age is the best outcome available to us.
But most old people are not dying. Not only are the ''old'' getting older, but the risk of death in the next year for a 70-year-old man is just 2 percent, and an 80-year-old woman has only a 4 percent likelihood of dying in the coming year, according to the Stanford economist John Shoven. Comments such as ''They're on their way out anyway'' are therefore more than colossally insensitive; they're also colossally inaccurate.
And they harm all of us. Some countries responded slowly to the coronavirus threat because they deemed it a condition primarily lethal to old people ''less worthy of the best efforts to contain it,'' the World Health Organization's director general, Dr. Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, noted recently. That some of the national leaders abiding by this assessment are themselves in the highest risk group is testament to one of the fundamental truths of ageism: that it is pervasive among old people themselves in ways that threaten both personal and national health.
The news and social media have been full of similarly counterproductive messages, even cruel memes such as ''Boomer Remover,'' a descendant of last year's dismissive and condescending ''OK, Boomer.''
This matters in the era of Covid-19 because in a culture that persists in ignoring the last century's huge gains in longevity and the obvious differences between young and much older adults, we are unable to address the needs of older Americans. It matters because the isolation necessary for slowing the rate of contagion will also cause irreparable harm to their health and have both short- and long-term economic effects. And it matters because when we accept the second-class citizenship of an entire category of human being, we set a precedent for treating others with the same disregard.
The effects of this isolation are being seen throughout the country. On Twitter, a young woman in Oregon described being called over to a car at her supermarket where a couple in their 80s sat scared to go inside lest they become infected; they handed her $100 to do their shopping so that they wouldn't starve. One of my geriatrics colleagues who cares for people in assisted living facilities in the San Francisco Bay Area told me one patient had commented that his current living situation was ''like being in solitary confinement and we have no idea for how long.'' A photo picked up by many news outlets shows a Connecticut man holding a sign outside his wife's nursing home window that said: ''I've loved you 67 years and still do. Happy anniversary.''
Isolation and neglect add to a history of systematic injury. The Trump administration didn't just eliminate the federal office of pandemic preparedness and dismiss or drive away scientists and experts at all levels of government; it also moved to decrease nursing home oversight and infection-control regulations. Meanwhile, although I could cite abundant data on the poor quality of many nursing homes and on the ubiquity of loneliness, neglect and mistreatment, and I could note that the facility in Kirkland, Wash., that responded so slowly to a lethal contagion had a top government rating, it is more compelling to simply ask: If you don't already live in a nursing home, are you looking forward to the time when you can move into one?
If your answer is no -- mine certainly is -- then here are some facts to consider as we shape our national response to this pandemic: One-third of American infections have occurred in people aged 65 and older, demonstrating a significantly disproportional impact, since that group makes up just 16 percent of the population. (And this assumes we are recognizing all cases; one can easily imagine the people who succumbed quickly in places where no one would think twice about the death of a frail, sickly old person.)
Older people represent 45 percent of Covid-19 hospitalizations, 53 percent of intensive care unit admissions and 80 percent of deaths. Meanwhile, this country's two most prominent medical journals have published articles exclusively about Covid-19 in children but no articles specifically devoted to the disease in old people.
Fortunately, the needs of the elderly are beginning to get more political and media attention. The Trump administration, recognizing that going into hospitals and clinics for nonurgent but needed appointments put the elderly at unnecessary risk for coronavirus infection, lifted restrictions on telephone and video conferences for Medicare beneficiaries. Social media abounds with stories and images of people paying for an old person's groceries, delivering food, writing letters, playing music outside nursing homes. There are so many ways to help while still maintaining social distance.
If this pandemic gets as bad as the worst predictions, we may eventually have to offer palliative care to people who might have survived with intensive care. As medical experts have noted, the primary criterion for rationing should be a negligible chance of survival whatever a patient's age. At the same time, while weeks on a ventilator are damaging to patients young and old, an elderly person's chance of meaningful recovery from that kind of physical trauma is small.
But there is also this: When we look at people as nothing more than amalgams of age and diagnosis, we miss their humanity. Last week in my clinic, I met an 87-year-old with heart, kidney, spine, blood and joint disease -- the sort of patient some doctors refer to as a ''train wreck.'' What is too often missed when such words are used are the other facts of that patient's life: that she only recently retired from her leadership position at a local service agency, that she had me laughing out loud several times during our visit, that her friends and family describe her as the strongest person they have ever met.
We can choose to either diminish our elders or support them. When we care for them, we not only are affecting the lives of people now but also are shaping our own futures.








When is an epidemic considered a pandemic, and what is the difference? What do health officials mean when they recommend ''self-quarantining'' or ''social distancing''?
As the coronavirus spreads around the world, new terms are entering the lexicon -- and we're here to help. Here's a guide to the words and phrases you need to know to keep informed of the latest developments.
Pandemic
Last week, the World Health Organization declared the coronavirus outbreak a pandemic after it spread across six continents and more than 100 countries. A pandemic is the worldwide spread of a new disease that affects large numbers of people. The W.H.O. had avoided using the word before Wednesday because it didn't want to give the impression that the disease was unstoppable.
''Pandemic is not a word to use lightly or carelessly,'' Dr. Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus, the director general of the W.H.O., said at a news conference.
Covid-19
The technical name for the coronavirus is SARS-CoV-2. The respiratory disease it causes has been named the ''coronavirus disease 2019,'' or Covid-19.
Coronaviruses are named for the crownlike spikes that protrude from their surfaces, resembling the sun's corona. Coronaviruses are among a large number of viruses that are common in people and many animals. The new virus, first detected in China, is believed to have originated in bats.
While antibiotics don't work against viruses, researchers are testing drugs that could disrupt viral proteins and stop the infection.
State of emergency
A state of emergency can be declared during natural disasters, epidemics and other public health emergencies. Declaring a state of emergency, as more than a dozen states -- including New York, New Jersey and Michigan -- have done, gives government officials the authority to take extra measures to protect the public, such as suspending regulations or reallocating funds to mitigate the spread of a disease.
Self-quarantine
This is key to keeping the virus from spreading, along with measures like social distancing, frequent hand-washing and wearing masks.
While isolation refers to separating sick people from people who aren't sick, quarantine refers to the separation and restriction of movement of people who were exposed to the virus to see if they become sick.
Who should self-quarantine? If you've left an area with widespread or continuing transmission, including China, Iran, Italy and South Korea, you should self-quarantine at home for a period of 14 days from the time you left, according to the C.D.C.
While in quarantine, you shouldn't receive any visitors and must stay three to six feet from others at all times.
According to the C.D.C., once someone has been in isolation for 14 days and hasn't become ill, he or she is not considered to be a risk to other people.
Incubation
The incubation period is the time it takes for symptoms to appear after a person is infected. This time can be critical for prevention and control, and it allows health officials to quarantine or observe people who may have been exposed to the virus.
The new coronavirus has an incubation period of two to 14 days, according to the C.D.C., with symptoms appearing about five days after infection in most cases.
During the incubation period, people may shed infectious virus particles before they exhibit symptoms, making it almost impossible to identify and isolate people who have the virus.
Fatality rate
The case fatality rate is the number of deaths divided by the total number of confirmed cases. Eventually, scientists hope to have a more comprehensive number called the infection fatality rate, which includes everyone who was infected with the virus.
The W.H.O. estimates the fatality rate of the new coronavirus to be 3 percent, based on current data, but experts suggest 1 percent is more realistic.
R-naught
The R-naught, or R0, is a virus's basic reproductive number -- an epidemiologic metric used to describe the contagiousness of infectious agents.
At its simplest, the basic reproductive number can show us how worried we should be about infection, according to Dr. Adam Kucharski, a mathematician at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine. If the R0 is above one, each case is expected to infect at least one other person on average, and the virus is likely to keep spreading. If it's less than one, a group of infected people are less likely to spread the infection.
Research is still in its early stages, but some estimates suggest that each person with the new coronavirus could infect between two and four people.
Containment
The virus's high transmission rate has made it difficult to effectively contain the outbreak. Containment refers to the use of any available tools to mitigate the spread of a disease, said Adam Ratner, the director of the division of pediatric infectious diseases at NYU Langone Health.
Early on, the Trump administration sought to slow the spread of the virus by barring entry into the United States by any foreign nationals who had traveled to China in the previous 14 days, excluding the immediate family members of American citizens or permanent residents. While that measure may have bought the government time to prepare, the administration made key missteps in its efforts to make widespread testing available in the early days of the outbreak, when containment would have been easier.
Dr. Ratner says the coronavirus is particularly hard to contain because it is ''reasonably transmissible,'' and some people who don't have a lot of symptoms can still pass the virus to others. ''That's been part of the problem,'' he said, ''but it also points to the fact to how interconnected we all are and how quickly this thing spread from Asia to the rest of the world.''





Now is an excellent time to assess your own situation and choose the best approach should the worst happen.
My phone rang with a FaceTime video, and my cousin’s face popped into view. We spent the first few minutes expressing our mutual disbelief and shock over Covid-19, acknowledging the insanity and underlying terror of these unprecedented circumstances. We joked about how our anxious mothers, with their endless reminders of dressing warm and staying indoors, had prepared us for this moment.
Then my cousin stood up and closed the door to her room. “I want to talk to you about something more serious,” she said. We both burst into laughter: What could be more serious than the end of the world?
She took a deep breath and I watched her face crumple as she asked if, in the unlikely event that she and her husband both ended up extremely ill — or worse — I would be willing to drive the 300 miles to her house and get her young sons. Around the globe, Covid-19 has made people like my cousin realize their own mortality, bringing about difficult, but necessary, conversations regarding their end-of-life wishes.
My cousin got her planning done in advance, but a friend of mine wasn’t so lucky. Her husband, having tested positive for the coronavirus, was texting her instructions for accessing their finances while being wheeled into a Boston intensive care unit for worsening shortness of breath.
So many of us have intentions of one day writing out our plans and instructions for end-of-life care, but most of us put that task off, for when we’re older or sicker. But the truth is, none of us knows when we will die.
As the proverb goes, “The best time to plant a tree was 20 years ago. The second-best time is now.” The same goes for end-of-life plans: The best time to make them is now, when you’re healthy and of sound mind.
In America, only one out of three adults has taken the time to complete an advance directive. Thisform — which varies by state — allows you to identify a person who would speak for you should you be unable to communicate, whether because of severe illness, sedation or having a breathing tube in your mouth. It also allows you to indicate your general wishes regarding life-prolonging interventions, including breathing machines and artificial feeding. And as my cousin and my friend realized, planning for the possibility of death should consider not only your health care preferences, but your family situation as well.
Without Covid-19 breathing down our backs, most of us look the other way from death. Even those of advanced age or with serious illness. We humans have a fantasy of perpetual life, clinging to the belief that our hospitals and our Dr. McDreamys will always be able to rescue us.
But we are suddenly receiving a communal bucket of water in the face. Sobering visuals of ventilators rigged to accommodate two bodies instead of one, corpses being loaded into refrigerated trucks, and the sudden cessation of patient visitation in most hospitals — it all feels so dystopian, so nightmarish. This lack of options. This presence of death.
But in many ways, it was always true. We will all die someday. Whether sooner, or later. And it pays to make the best plans while you still can. So now is an excellent time to assess your own situation and choose the best approach should the worst happen. Complete an advance directive. Make sure there is a plan for who would care for your children and your pets if you were rushed to the hospital. Make sure your spouse knows the passwords for your bank accounts.
If you are feeling sick, consider having an emergency bag ready with a list of essentials to add at the last minute — such as glasses, dentures, phone and charger — since it is unlikely that anyone will be able to bring them to you if you end up in the hospital. Download the Covid-specific tip sheet at Prepare for Your Care for strategies for planning.
And for those of you with advanced age or serious underlying illness, you might actually consider whether you would prefer to go to the hospital if you become seriously ill with coronavirus, or stay at home with the support of hospice or palliative care services. The National Hospice and Palliative Care Organization has publisheda new tool to help with that decision in the era of Covid-19. It factors in age, comorbidities and current symptoms, and helps determine your likelihood of survival should you contract the virus. It may also get you thinking about your preferences even if you aren’t infected with the coronavirus.
Having a plan in place, one that doesn’t sugarcoat reality, is the best preparation for ensuring that you are treated as you would wish. It also provides needed clarity to your loved ones, as we all navigate this pandemic together.
Covid-19 is a dreadful scourge on humanity. But as my cousin realized, planning ahead for the worst-case scenarios will provide a somber yet comforting peace of mind in these uncertain times. Just because something was previously unimaginable doesn’t mean it won’t happen. If we have the time to take on projects like cleaning out our kitchen pantries and doing 1,000-piece puzzles, then we can surely take on one of the most important to-dos on our list — preparing for the end of life.





When the Krewe of Zulu parade rolled out onto Jackson Avenue to kick off Mardi Gras festivities on Feb. 25, the party started for black New Orleans. Tens of thousands of people lined the four-and-a-half-mile route, reveling in the animated succession of jazz musicians, high-stepping marching bands from historically black colleges and universities and loose-limbed dancers dressed in Zulu costumes, complete with grass skirts and blackface makeup, an homage to the Zulu people of South Africa and, for some, a satirical spit in the eye to the past, when Mardi Gras was put on by clubs of white men who barred black people from taking part.
Though some black critics have chided the Zulus for continuing to “black up,” their costumes and traditions are a way of reclaiming and redeploying the most toxic stereotypes of black Americans. Founded in 1909, the Zulu Social Aid and Pleasure Club is a brotherhood of some 800 men, nearly all of them black, known for community service, civic pride, black excellence and that Mardi Gras parade. And so on that late February day, as people stood shoulder to shoulder and several feet deep, hoping to catch a painted coconut, the “throw” that is the Zulu parade’s signature and coveted prize, no one had any idea that this joyous gathering would turn out to be a coronavirus hothouse.
For the Zulu club, the Carnival season involves a series of meticulously planned and eagerly awaited ceremonies, balls and festivals, almost every day in January and February. The Zulu Ball, one of the group’s three grand-scale, marquee events, fell on Friday, Feb. 21, this year. Some 20,000 people, floor-length ball gowns and tuxedos required, packed into the New Orleans Ernest N. Morial Convention Center — one of the few venues large enough to hold the crowd that came to eat and drink and dance and witness the crowning of the Zulu King and Queen of Mardi Gras. At the parade, the king, elected by club members, wears a golden crown and an elaborate festoon of feathers. He rides on a float, waving a glittery scepter at the crowd, flanked by two hand-painted leopards rearing up on their hind legs.
As Mardi Gras festivities began, bringing over a million visitors from around the world streaming into the warm, welcoming city to celebrate face to face and elbow to elbow with local residents in a progression of street parties and parades, dozens of coronavirus cases had already been documented in China, which reported its first death on Jan. 11. On Jan. 20, the first known case was confirmed in the United States: a Washington State resident who had recently returned from Wuhan, China. Behind the scenes, Louisiana health administrators had begun discussing the growing situation, seeing it as low-risk, according to emails obtained by Columbia University’s Brown Institute for Media Innovation.
On Feb. 5, four days after Surgeon General Jerome Adams tweeted, “Roses are red/Violets are blue/Risk is low for #coronavirus/But high for the flu,” New Orleans officials held a multiagency coronavirus planning meeting. The same day, a statement posted on the city’s website read: “Our public health and health care systems are ready for Mardi Gras, and the coronavirus poses a very low risk to the Carnival celebrations.” At the time, just 12 cases had been reported in the United States and none in Louisiana.
On Sunday, Feb. 23, two days after the Zulu Ball, President Trump set the tone for the country, the state of Louisiana and the city of New Orleans when he said at a news conference: “We have it very much under control in the country.” On Monday, Feb. 24, when an estimated 200,000 people spent the day at Lundi Gras, sponsored by the Zulu club, enjoying a smorgasbord of New Orleans food and music on three stages at Woldenberg Park along the Mississippi River, he reiterated on Twitter that the disease was “under control.” According to an internal memo, however, Trump had already been warned by his own trade adviser about the potential of half a million deaths and an economic hemorrhage of trillions of dollars as a result of the pandemic. According to reports, his health and human services director had alerted him twice about the possibility of a pandemic; the president accused him of being alarmist.
The day after Lundi Gras, the Zulu club member Cornell Charles — everybody called him Dickey, a childhood nickname — rose early and put on a honey yellow jacket, part of the group’s signature uniform. As part of the Zulu Krewe parade organizing committee, he spent the next 10 hours fussing over the logistics of the exuberant, chaotic parade. Larry A. Hammond, 70, a former Zulu king and a club member, waved to the crowd from one of the many floats. On that same day, officials from the C.D.C. issued a far bleaker warning than any before about the spread of the virus in the United States, recommending social-distancing measures. Yet the president himself was still playing down the risk; that same day, while traveling in India, Trump said, “We have very few people with it.” The people who did have it, he said, “are getting better, they’re all getting better.” The following day, he reassured the country that the number of confirmed cases “within a couple of days is going to be down close to zero.”
Mayor LaToya Cantrell of New Orleans stood on St. Charles Avenue during the Feb. 25 parade next to Jay H. Banks, chairman of the Zulu club’s board, raising a glass and joyfully shouting, “Hail Zulu!” as the king passed by on his float. She would later defend not canceling the festivities. “When it’s not taken seriously at the federal level, it’s very difficult to transcend down to the local level in making these decisions,” Cantrell told CNN on March 26.
On March 9, the same day Louisiana reported its first presumptive case of Covid-19, Trump compared the virus to the flu on Twitter, and also tweeted: “The Fake News Media and their partner, the Democrat Party, is doing everything within its semi-considerable power (it used to be greater!) to inflame the CoronaVirus situation, far beyond what the facts would warrant.”
Banks, a city councilman who first became involved with the Zulu club as a boy, remembers the rush of panic he felt on March 16, when he saw a Facebook post about the first of his Zulu brothers to get sick, Dickey Charles, who was just 51. Written by the chaplain of the Zulu club, Jefferson Reese Sr., it read, “Zulu Brother Cornell ‘Dickey’ Charles is very ill and in need of prayer. Amen” followed by three brown praying-hands emojis. “When I saw the post, I thought, Oh, man,” Banks says. “I knew we were going to have a problem.” Eight weeks after Mardi Gras, at least 30 members of the club had been found to have Covid-19. Eight would be dead.
Banks, who believes he knows at least 16 people who have died of the disease, says if he and the Zulu leadership had had the slightest clue that the pandemic was a direct danger, they would have canceled their events. “The president was saying that this was not a big deal, and nobody in the federal government raised a red flag,” Banks says. Gov. John Bel Edwards of Louisiana could have canceled the parade. But like Mayor Cantrell, he said he had little useful guidance from Washington. “There was not one person at the state or its federal government, not at the C.D.C. or otherwise, who recommended canceling any event, not just Mardi Gras, but I don’t think anywhere across the country,” he told “Face the Nation” on March 29.
“Zulu is 800 men, predominantly black,” Banks says. “Like all black communities, we have a large contingent of people who have pre-existing conditions. Our members come from all walks of life, and many of them don’t have jobs with sick days and don’t have the luxury of working at home. When you add these factors to a disease that capitalizes on these kind of circumstances, you get a perfect storm.”
On April 6, Louisiana became one of the first states to release Covid-19 data by race: While making up 33 percent of the population, African-Americans accounted for 70 percent of the dead at that point. Around the same time, other cities and states began to release racial data in the absence of even a whisper from the federal government — where health data of all kinds is routinely categorized by race. Areas with large populations of black people were revealed to have disproportionate, devastating death rates. In Michigan, black people make up 14 percent of the population but 40 percent of the deaths. (All data was current as of press time.) In Wisconsin, black people are 7 percent of the population but 33 percent of the deaths. In Mississippi, black people are 38 percent of the population but 61 percent of the deaths. In Milwaukee, black people are 39 percent of the population but 71 percent of the deaths. In Chicago, black people are 30 percent of the population but 56 percent of the deaths. In New York, which has the country’s highest numbers of confirmed cases and deaths, black people are twice as likely to die as white people. In Orleans Parish, black people make up 60 percent of the population but 70 percent of the dead. Data from the Louisiana Department of Health shows that neighborhoods in the parish with large numbers of black residents have been hit hardest.
The coronavirus pandemic has stripped bare the racial divide in the health of our nation. A complex and longstanding constellation of factors explains these higher death rates. On April 8, a C.D.C. study suggested that about 90 percent of the most serious Covid-19 cases involve underlying health conditions — hypertension and cardiovascular disease, obesity, diabetes, chronic lung disease — that are more common and more deadly in black Americans and strike at younger ages. According to the C.D.C., the rate of diabetes is 66 percent higher in black Americans than in white Americans; the rate of hypertension is 49 percent higher. The average black life expectancy, from birth, is about 3.5 years lower than white life expectancy. In fact, the health outcomes of black Americans are by several measures on par with those of people in poorer countries with much less sophisticated medical systems and technology. And though these health disparities are certainly worsened by poverty, they are not erased by increased income and education. The elevated rates of these serious illnesses have weaponized the coronavirus to catastrophic effect in black America.
Earl Benjamin-Robinson is deputy director of the Louisiana Department of Health’s Office of Community Partnerships and Health Equity, created in 2019 to identify and target health disparities in vulnerable populations. “When we first started hearing about Covid in China,” he says, “and learned that those who got severely ill and who subsequently died dealt with underlying conditions like hypertension, diabetes, lung disease and so on, I became concerned and kept in the forefront knowing that African-Americans in the U.S. and in our state are overrepresented when it comes to those conditions.” Benjamin-Robinson, who lives in New Orleans, says he also had begun hearing rumors in the local community and on social media that black people were immune to the coronavirus, supposedly because melanin protected against it. These false theories became so rampant that on March 17, the day after the actor Idris Elba announced that he had tested positive for the disease, he posted a Twitter live video to denounce the rumors. “There are so many stupid, ridiculous conspiracy theories about black people not being able to get it,” he said. “That’s dumb, stupid.”
“As public-health officials, we knew about the clear, distinct racial health disparities, as it relates to chronic illnesses in our state, in the early months,” Benjamin-Robinson says. “But in the absence of racial data and with no real sense of urgency coming from the federal government, we weren’t able to put a plan in action to create targeted messaging and get information directly to African-Americans.” After the release of racial data for Louisiana in early April, Benjamin-Robinson’s office helped develop public-health promotional materials about Covid-19 specifically for black Louisianans, which were distributed via email and social media.
On March 27, Senators Kamala Harris of California, Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts and Cory Booker of New Jersey, and Representatives Ayanna Pressley of Massachusetts and Robin Kelly of Illinois, all Democrats, sent a letter to Alex Azar, secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, urging the agency to reveal racial data on testing and treatment for the virus. “Although Covid-19 does not discriminate along racial or ethnic lines, existing racial disparities and inequities in health outcomes and health care access may mean that the nation’s response to preventing and mitigating its harms will not be felt equally in every community,” the lawmakers wrote. “Lack of information will exacerbate existing health disparities and result in the loss of lives in vulnerable communities.”
On April 3, the American Medical Association, the professional organization that represents some 250,000 physicians, residents and medical students, also implored the Department of Health and Human Services to release coronavirus data by race. “It is well documented that social and health inequities are longstanding and systemic disturbances to the wellness of marginalized, minoritized and medically underserved communities,” read its letter, co-signed by organizations including the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians and the National Medical Association. “While Covid-19 has not created the circumstances that have brought about health inequities, it has and will continue to severely exacerbate existing and alarming social inequities along racial and ethnic lines.”
Amid this pressure from lawmakers, physicians, scientists and advocacy groups to release national Covid-19 statistics by race, on Wednesday, April 8, the C.D.C. put out a limited data set of 1,482 coronavirus patients hospitalized in 14 states. It indicated that despite making up 18 percent of those studied, black people accounted for a third of all severe cases.
At the daily White House press briefing the day before, President Trump, apparently aware of the C.D.C. numbers that were about to be released, asked Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, who has served under six American presidents and is the most visible member of the White House coronavirus-response team, to address Covid-19 among black Americans. Dr. Fauci highlighted the underlying health conditions that are more common among black Americans and that raise the risk of death from Covid-19. “We’re very concerned about that,” he said. “It’s very sad. There’s nothing we can do about it right now, except to try and give them the best possible care to avoid those complications.”
Trump then referred to the racial statistics as “very nasty numbers. Terrible numbers.” As the news conference went on, the president expressed confusion about the disproportionate rates of infection. “Why is it that the African-American community is so much, you know, numerous times more than everybody else?” he asked.
Fifty years after the legislative and societal advances of the civil rights movement, America remains deeply segregated. Black people are more likely than white people to live in communities with high rates of poverty, where physical and social structures are crumbling, where opportunity is low and unemployment high. Even educated, affluent black people live in poorer neighborhoods, on average, than white people with working-class incomes.
The conditions in the social and physical environment where people live, work, attend school, play and pray have an outsize influence on health outcomes. Those in the public-health field call these conditions social determinants of health. Living in safe communities with adequate education and health care services, outdoor space, clean air and water, public transportation and affordable healthful food all contribute to lower rates of disease and longer, healthier lives. Living where the streets are unsafe and the air and water are polluted, where adequate health care facilities and outdoor space are lacking and where a dearth of healthful and affordable food creates a “desert” all leads to poorer health outcomes.
As scientists and policymakers have known since the 1980s, black and poor communities shoulder a disproportionate burden of the nation’s pollution. Covid-19 typically attacks the lungs and is especially dangerous to those with existing respiratory conditions, and a paper released on April 5 by researchers at the Harvard T.H. Chan School of Public Health found that a majority of the conditions that increase the risk of death from Covid-19 are also affected by long-term exposure to air pollution. After analyzing over 3,000 U.S. counties, the researchers concluded that even a small increase in exposure to fine particulate matter — tiny particles in the air — leads to a significant increase in the Covid-19 death rate. Less than two weeks after the report was released, the Trump administration declined to impose stricter controls on the lung-corroding industrial matter that the Harvard researchers underlined as hazardous.
New Orleans is at the southeastern end of what has been called Cancer Alley, the 85-mile stretch of the Mississippi known for its concentration of polluting petrochemical manufacturers. “As soon as I heard about Covid, I started getting nervous about the relationship between PM 2.5 and this virus,” says Beverly Wright, the founder and executive director of the Deep South Center for Environmental Justice in New Orleans. PM 2.5 refers to the width of the airborne particles: 2.5 micrometers or less, a small fraction of the width of a human hair. “We have long known that emissions coming from these facilities are very dangerous to the health of people who live nearby, and it is black people who live the closest. So I’m getting tired of being told our Covid death rates are only because we’re obese or have diabetes or are eating badly, without any regard to the systematic harm pollution has caused us.”
The accumulated effects of environmental inequality are compounded by the physiological ramifications of an atmosphere of bias and discrimination, which have been documented to lead to higher rates of poor health outcomes for black Americans. Dr. Arline Geronimus, a professor at the University of Michigan School of Public Health, termed this phenomenon “weathering.” The landmark research she and her colleagues published in 2006 pointed to early health deterioration, caused by stress that required high-effort coping, evident across multiple biological systems even when adjusted for poverty. The authors concluded that the lived experience of being black exacted a physical price on the bodies of African-Americans. Dr. Camara Phyllis Jones, a physician and epidemiologist and a former president of the American Public Health Association, describes this effect as “accelerated aging.” “We have evidence that the wear and tear of racism, the stress of it, is responsible for the differences in health outcomes in the black population compared to the white population,” Dr. Jones says. In a 2019 study comparing 71 individuals, 48 of them black, a team of U.C.L.A. scientists found evidence that racist experiences may lead to increased inflammation in black Americans, heightening the risk of serious illness including heart disease. In the study, published in the journal Psychoneuroendocrinology, the scientists compared participants with similar socioeconomic backgrounds to rule out poverty as a determining factor in the changes in inflammation.
The societal discrimination that harms the bodies of those on the receiving end is also present in the health care system itself. In 2003, the National Academy of Sciences documented the effects of bias in the medical system in a report that laid out the facts in damning detail. “Unequal Treatment: Confronting Racial and Ethnic Disparities in Health Care” examined 480 previous studies and found that in every medical intervention, black people and other people of color received poorer-quality care than white people, even when income and insurance were equal. This unequal treatment in the health care system persists today in numerous studies showing that black patients receive inadequate pain management for a variety of illnesses, surgeries and other medical procedures, both in the emergency room and in other settings, compared with people of other races. New York City’s health department is among a number of health departments and medical facilities around the country that have acknowledged the problem by mandating anti-racism training for their employees. During the current pandemic, health care providers are putting themselves in the line of fire to save lives, but they are working within a flawed system. “Research on implicit bias shows it’s more likely to operate when people are working under time pressure,” explains Dr. David Williams, chairman of the department of social and behavioral sciences at Harvard’s T.H. Chan School. Dr. Williams suggests that this kind of pressure could be worsened by long shifts, fatigue, the need to make quick judgments and even a shortage of protective gear and ventilators. “All of those are factors that are more likely to make health care providers go into autopilot,” he says. “And when they do, they are more likely to rely on the shorthand social categorization to navigate their decisions. So I worry about what it means in terms of the life-or-death decisions in the context of coronavirus.”
Dr. Clyde W. Yancy, chief of cardiology in the department of medicine at Northwestern’s Feinberg School of Medicine, has studied racial health inequities for most of his career. As a black man and a native of the Baton Rouge area who grew up during segregation, he also understands them on a personal level. “These disparities are real, they are deep and they are exacting a terrible price,” says Dr. Yancy, who wrote an article pulling together research about the connection between black Americans and Covid-19, published online in The Journal of the American Medical Association on April 15. “If there ever was a moment to have a rallying cry, to have a call to action, to have a wake-up call, there should be a moment of epiphany right now. And that epiphany should be: This is not the way a civil society allows its population to exist.”
About 10 days after the end of Mardi Gras, Dickey Charles told his wife, Nicole, that he wasn’t feeling well. Charles, a courier for GE Healthcare, rose most days around 2 a.m. to work an early route driving a van to deliver medical supplies to hospitals and clinics. His second shift, as a supervisor at the New Orleans Recreation Development Commission and the baseball, football and girls’ basketball coach at Lusher Charter School, left him little time for rest. Adding the annual whirlwind of Zulu Carnival activities was taxing for Charles, though he rarely let on. He was an easygoing, humble mountain of a man and father of two grown daughters. At six feet and 260 pounds, he carried his weight well. But he also had a number of health conditions: hypertension, diabetes and kidney disease. His wife, who worked as a medical administrator, kept a watchful eye on him but also says he tried to take good care of himself. “He had been fighting those things for 20 years,” says Nicole Charles, who added that her husband took three different blood-pressure medications, two kinds of insulin and another medication for his kidneys. “He was very good with taking his medications. I didn’t have to fight him, never had to fuss.”
Burnell Scales Sr., Nicole’s father, who goes by Slim, knew something was wrong on Sunday, March 8, when he showed up at the Charleses’ home in Uptown Carrollton, expecting to see his son-in-law stirring a giant pot of gumbo or red beans or heaping shrimp, crawfish and crabs onto plates for the procession of friends, family and Zulu members who came by every week after church for an open-door hangout and to watch Saints games during football season. “I came in thinking he’d be handing me a plate of something he was cooking up, but he wasn’t in the kitchen like usual,” says Scales, who joined the Zulus decades ago and introduced his son-in-law to the group in 2004. “He was in bed. That’s when I started to worry a little.”
On March 12, it was clear to Nicole that Charles still didn’t feel well. His fever had been up and down, spiking close to 102. She stayed close to him, administering fluids and Tylenol, assuming he had the flu. That day, after it proved difficult to get a fast appointment with his primary-care doctor, she insisted that he go to urgent care, where he was tested for the flu. When the test was negative, he was sent home — with no mention of Covid-19.
Nicole’s anxiety rose the following day when he completely lost his appetite. “My husband is a big man, and food was definitely something he loved,” she says. She also worried that he needed to eat something because he couldn’t take medications to control his blood pressure, diabetes and kidney problems on an empty stomach. “Even if he was sick, he would still eat, but I couldn’t even get him to eat soup.”
That Friday, Nicole says, she told him, “Baby, we’re going to the hospital.” “Of course, that was an argument,” she says, “because he’s a man.” They agreed to go the next day. “I said to him, ‘You’re going, because you don’t have a choice.’”
The next day, Saturday, March 14, her husband told her he felt weaker, and Nicole took him to the emergency room. Security was high at the hospital as the growing coronavirus cases had begun to grip the city: That day, the Louisiana Department of Health reported 77 cases of the virus, 53 of them in Orleans Parish, and the first death. “It was like Fort Knox,” Nicole recalls. “They directed me to one area so I could register him and took him off to another where I couldn’t go. And of course you had to put on a mask; they gave everybody one.”
In the E.R., Charles was again tested for the flu, and again the test was negative. But Nicole says no one suggested a Covid-19 test at that time. By that evening, Charles was lying in a hospital bed, attached to IV fluids. “It just all happened so fast,” says Nicole, her voice catching. “It was like zero to 100.”
In the late 19th century, W.E.B. Du Bois, the eminent black sociologist and author, conducted research to better understand the diseases that contributed to high rates of mortality in black communities. Du Bois and his team did extensive shoe-leather fieldwork that he would turn into his 1899 opus, “The Philadelphia Negro,” canvassing neighborhoods and interviewing residents in 2,500 households. He also used census data to document the distribution of health status. Unlike most experts at the time, who blamed racial inferiority and genetic flaws for health inequities, Du Bois highlighted the social conditions they studiously ignored. In a later work, “The Health and Physique of the Negro American,” Du Bois wrote: “With the improved sanitary condition, improved education and better economic opportunities, the mortality of the race may and probably will steadily decrease until it becomes normal.” Du Bois was unsparing on the lack of empathy for the health and well-being of black Americans, who were still reeling and recovering from 250 years of enslavement and struggling through the reactionary years of Jim Crow. “The most difficult social problem in the matter of Negro health is the peculiar attitude of the nation toward the well-being of the race,” Du Bois wrote in “The Philadelphia Negro.” There were, he continued, “few other cases in the history of civilized peoples where human suffering has been viewed with such peculiar indifference.”
This “peculiar indifference” was infamously sanctioned by the federal government between 1932 and 1972, when the United States Public Health Service conducted a study on hundreds of black day laborers and sharecroppers in Alabama. The “Tuskegee Study of Untreated Syphilis in the Negro Male” examined the progression of untreated syphilis, under the assumption that the infection manifested differently in black people. The subjects were told they would receive treatment for what was described as “bad blood,” but they never did. Instead, they were poked and prodded while the illness was allowed to progress. Once the men died, doctors autopsied their bodies to compile data on the ravages of the disease. The effects of the Tuskegee syphilis study still reverberate in the form of distrust and sometimes avoidance of the health care system among black Americans. In our current moment, this medical distrust has shown up in the form of those conspiracy theories and low-information rumors about Covid-19 — akin to the false theories and rumors that were also prevalent during the AIDS era — that Dr. Benjamin-Robinson of the Louisiana Department of Health warned against and Idris Elba tried to dispel.
In 1985, nearly a century after Du Bois made his observations about racial health disparities, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services released the “Report of the Secretary’s Task Force on Black and Minority Health,” better known as the Heckler Report. This 239-page study marked the first time the federal government had comprehensively examined the health status of black people and other people of color and elevated the issue of health inequality into the national arena. Named for Secretary Margaret Heckler of H.H.S., the report estimated more than 18,000 “excess deaths” each year among black people because of heart disease and stroke, compared with the number of deaths that would occur if their health were on par with that of non-Hispanic white people. It also cited 8,100 excess deaths from cancer, 6,200 from infant mortality and 1,850 from diabetes. Heckler called this shameful inequality “an affront both to our ideals and to the ongoing genius of American medicine.”
But the Heckler Report recommended no new government funding to address the crisis. Instead, the report essentially advised black Americans to save themselves by improving their health through education, self-help and self-care. Dr. Edith Irby Jones, president of the National Medical Association, a black medical society, was one of many critics of the report’s emphasis on merely health education and lifestyle changes. “If black people would only ‘behave,’ their health problems would be solved,” she wrote in 1986 in the association’s journal. The insidious conclusion was that black people, individually and collectively, were poor, irresponsible, careless, uneducated and making thoughtless choices that led to the health crisis in the first place. There was — and remains — little focus on the societal conditions that erode the health of black Americans, and little mention of discrimination and bias either inside or outside the health care system.
Surgeon General Jerome Adams echoed this trope when he recently implied that individual behavior was leading to higher deaths from Covid-19 among African-Americans. At a White House press briefing on Friday, April 10, he told “communities of color” to “step up and help stop the spread so that we can protect those who are most vulnerable.” Adams, who is black and has spoken openly of his own struggles with high blood pressure, asthma and pre-diabetes, nonetheless added that African-Americans and Latinos should “avoid alcohol, tobacco and drugs.” He went on: “We need you to do this, if not for yourself, then for your abuela. Do it for your granddaddy. Do it for your big mama. Do it for your pop-pop.”
Dr. Williams of Harvard cautions against such suggestions. “It’s important to recognize and to acknowledge that the higher death rates of African-Americans from the coronavirus are not linked to the individual decisions black people have made or their communities have made,” he says. “We are looking at societal policies, driven by institutional racism, that are producing the results that they were intended to produce.”
Many of the same experts who had pushed to release coronavirus data by race also worried that racial disparities in infections, hospitalizations and deaths would be used against black people. And like clockwork, after cities with sizable populations of black people began to report large numbers of Covid-19 infections at the beginning of April and statistics showed disproportionate death rates for African-Americans, a counternarrative began to arise: The national, state and municipal shutdowns were too draconian; the coronavirus pandemic was not as much of a threat — at least, not to all Americans — as had been argued. A smattering of demonstrations broke out the week of April 13, as protesters gathered in a handful of states to push back against stay-at-home orders.
President Trump fanned the extremist flames on April 17 in a series of tweets that encouraged his supporters to flout state policies put in place to keep residents safe during the pandemic. “LIBERATE MINNESOTA!” Trump wrote. “LIBERATE MICHIGAN!” “LIBERATE VIRGINIA, and save your great 2nd Amendment. It is under siege!” The next day in Austin, Tex., at a “You Can’t Close America” rally, hundreds of demonstrators, nearly all white, defied social-distancing guidelines by gathering on the steps of the Capitol. The protesters — many without masks but outfitted with Trump hats and flags — shouted “Let us work” and “Fire Fauci.” A woman wearing a Keep America Great cap waved a sign reading, “My Life, My Death, My Choice, Personal Responsibility,” and another protester held a hand-drawn poster that read, “My Life! Not Yours!”
Dr. Jones notes that even before the coronavirus struck, the country had veered toward an ominous distrust of legitimate science that spread down from the White House and into the streets. But the pandemic has intensified the peril of such thinking. “These protesters don’t understand that nobody is immune to this infectious disease that doesn’t respect state borders, city borders, neighborhood borders,” she says. “We are not the land of the free and the home of the brave individually, but their individual actions have profound impacts on the collective. We’re in a dangerous situation by letting ideology take priority over the health interest and well-being of the nation.”
On Sunday, March 15, the day after he was admitted to the hospital, Dickey Charles’s oxygen levels had become unstable, with his fever spiking and breaking. Late that evening, a chest X-ray showed potential signs of pneumonia. Nicole, who had been sleeping on a pullout chair next to her husband in his room, said one of the doctors told her it was time for an honest conversation. “They said, ‘Your husband is much sicker than he looks,.” she remembers. .‘His lungs will not be functioning much longer. We need to vent him.’” That day, her husband was finally tested for Covid-19.
Nicole was able to stay with Charles for the next three days, locked to his side. Attached to the ventilator, unable to speak, he looked surprisingly peaceful to her, even vital. She kept up a vigil of prayer, whispering “I love you” over and over. She streamed gospel music on Pandora on her phone, taking comfort in the song “The Blood Still Works.” “It’s still healing,” she sang to him. “There is power in the blood of Jesus, the blood still works.” She had Charles’s phone with her and did her best to field an avalanche of calls from worried family members and Zulu brothers. “I told them, ‘Please keep him in prayer,.” she says.
On Wednesday, March 18, while Nicole was in the midst of praying, Charles opened his eyes. “I said to him: ‘Baby, you opened your eyes for me! I love you so much,.” she recalls. “That was the last time I saw my husband with his eyes open.” The next day, Nicole says, hospital administrators told her she could no longer visit her husband because of a shortage of personal protective equipment. Louisiana’s caseload had increased to 392 cases from 280 the day before. At a news conference, Governor Edwards announced that the state’s health care system could be overwhelmed in seven to 10 days on its current trajectory.
Five days later, on Tuesday, March 24, a team of hospital medical providers called Nicole. Charles’s blood pressure had dropped, and his kidneys had failed. They told her that he wasn’t going to make it. They asked if she would like to see him in person or use FaceTime. She wanted to see him and asked if his two daughters could come too. The hospital ran through a series of questions to assess the daughters’ own exposure to the coronavirus, and then administrators allowed Bethaney, 24; Le’Treion, 32; and Nicole to come to his room. Wearing gowns, gloves and masks, they prayed over his body and said goodbye. At 1:30, when Charles took his last breath, Nicole, his wife of nearly 30 years, was by his side. “I told God, ‘I love him; I’m leaving him in your hands,.” she says. “I said, ‘Please let him rest, let him go in peace.&#39;”
The following day, as Nicole was subsumed by staggering grief, she received a call that Charles’s Covid-19 test had come back positive. Since his death, she and Le’Treion have tested negative for the virus. Bethaney and Nicole’s father, Burnell Scales, have tested positive; Bethaney has remained asymptomatic, while Scales had mild symptoms and has since recovered.
The afternoon Charles died, Jay Banks was crushed to learn that two other friends had died as well. The same day, at a White House briefing, President Trump stated, “There is tremendous hope as we look forward and we begin to see the light at the end of the tunnel.” At a Fox News town hall, he said: “I would love to have the country opened up and just raring to go by Easter.” Since then, Reese, the Zulu club’s chaplain, has posted a heart-wrenching scroll of deaths on his Facebook page: the Zulu warriors who have received, he wrote, “their wings.” On March 26, Earl Henry Jr., 63, died. He was a Zulu member for nearly half his life. Three days later, Terry Sharpe Sr., 49, died. He drove a truck for a living and was a loyal member of Pilgrim Baptist Church. On March 31, Larry A. Hammond died. A retired postal worker, he was a member of the Omega Psi Phi fraternity and a veteran of the Air Force; he died in the local V.A. hospital. On the day of his death, Mayor Cantrell tweeted that he had been “a vital part of our city’s rebirth after Katrina, and a culture bearer in the truest sense.” She included a picture of them smiling together. Hammond was wearing his Zulu jacket.
The Zulu Social Aid and Pleasure Club had its origins at the intersection of discrimination and death. After Emancipation, formerly enslaved Africans often could not afford to bury their dead. So they pooled their money by forming social-aid clubs to provide dignified, respectful funerals. But the coronavirus has broken the Zulu club’s 111-year tradition of sending off passing members with respect and grace. On April 3, fewer than a dozen people came to Zion Travelers First Baptist Church to say goodbye to Dickey Charles. They sat scattered throughout the pews in the chapel in observance of the guidelines Mayor Cantrell put into place on March 16 prohibiting gatherings of more than a few people. Nicole and her family managed to live-stream the service, and another 600 people watched from home. Elroy A. James, an assistant attorney general for Louisiana and the president of the Zulu club, tuned in, saddened that the organization wasn’t able to celebrate its fallen brother in style. “He deserved a second-line funeral,” James says, referring to the New Orleans tradition of commemorating life with a spirited procession of pageantry, jazz and dance. “Man, it would have been great.”
As a boy and later a student at Southern University and the Tulane University School of Medicine, Dr. Clyde W. Yancy, the cardiologist at Northwestern, remembers being fascinated with the decorated coconuts, the sought-after prize of the Krewe of Zulu parade. “Everybody, including me, wanted a gold Zulu coconut,” he says. “There was no status, no privilege, we were all just standing on the sidewalk, hoping we got lucky enough to catch the gold coconut.”
He says this precious memory has been marred by the racial health disparities he has spent much of his career studying, the disparities that have come to define the American outbreak of Covid-19 — and the harm this lethal combination has inflicted on the Zulu club. “These men were doing something as seemingly harmless as socializing, as networking, and just because of that moment of fellowship to celebrate their heritage, they’re now dead?” he says. “That just made me pause. It makes you understand the pain, the hurt of this gap in health care outcomes as a function of race that have been with us for decades. Covid-19 has basically taken off the Band-Aid that was covering the wound, pointed out how deep it is and left us no other choice but to finally say: We get it, we see it.”






This is what I learned during 10 days of treating Covid pneumonia at Bellevue Hospital.
I have been practicing emergency medicine for 30 years. In 1994 I invented an imaging system for teaching intubation, the procedure of inserting breathing tubes. This led me to perform research into this procedure, and subsequently teach airway procedure courses to physicians worldwide for the last two decades.
So at the end of March, as a crush of Covid-19 patients began overwhelming hospitals in New York City, I volunteered to spend 10 days at Bellevue, helping at the hospital where I trained. Over those days, I realized that we are not detecting the deadly pneumonia the virus causes early enough and that we could be doing more to keep patients off ventilators -- and alive.
On the long drive to New York from my home in New Hampshire, I called my friend Nick Caputo, an emergency physician in the Bronx, who was already in the thick of it. I wanted to know what I was facing, how to stay safe and what his insights into airway management with this disease were. ''Rich,'' he said, ''it's like nothing I've ever seen before.''
He was right. Pneumonia caused by the coronavirus has had a stunning impact on the city's hospital system. Normally an E.R. has a mix of patients with conditions ranging from the serious, such as heart attacks, strokes and traumatic injuries, to the non-life-threatening, such as minor lacerations, intoxication, orthopedic injuries and migraine headaches.
During my recent time at Bellevue, though, almost all the E.R. patients had Covid pneumonia. Within the first hour of my first shift I inserted breathing tubes into two patients.
Even patients without respiratory complaints had Covid pneumonia. The patient stabbed in the shoulder, whom we X-rayed because we worried he had a collapsed lung, actually had Covid pneumonia. In patients on whom we did CT scans because they were injured in falls, we coincidentally found Covid pneumonia. Elderly patients who had passed out for unknown reasons and a number of diabetic patients were found to have it.
And here is what really surprised us: These patients did not report any sensation of breathing problems, even though their chest X-rays showed diffuse pneumonia and their oxygen was below normal. How could this be?
We are just beginning to recognize that Covid pneumonia initially causes a form of oxygen deprivation we call ''silent hypoxia'' -- ''silent'' because of its insidious, hard-to-detect nature.
Pneumonia is an infection of the lungs in which the air sacs fill with fluid or pus. Normally, patients develop chest discomfort, pain with breathing and other breathing problems. But when Covid pneumonia first strikes, patients don't feel short of breath, even as their oxygen levels fall. And by the time they do, they have alarmingly low oxygen levels and moderate-to-severe pneumonia (as seen on chest X-rays). Normal oxygen saturation for most persons at sea level is 94 to 100 percent; Covid pneumonia patients I saw had oxygen saturations as low as 50 percent.
To my amazement, most patients I saw said they had been sick for a week or so with fever, cough, upset stomach and fatigue, but they only became short of breath the day they came to the hospital. Their pneumonia had clearly been going on for days, but by the time they felt they had to go to the hospital, they were often already in critical condition.
In emergency departments we insert breathing tubes in critically ill patients for a variety of reasons. In my 30 years of practice, however, most patients requiring emergency intubation are in shock, have altered mental status or are grunting to breathe. Patients requiring intubation because of acute hypoxia are often unconscious or using every muscle they can to take a breath. They are in extreme duress. Covid pneumonia cases are very different.
A vast majority of Covid pneumonia patients I met had remarkably low oxygen saturations at triage -- seemingly incompatible with life -- but they were using their cellphones as we put them on monitors. Although breathing fast, they had relatively minimal apparent distress, despite dangerously low oxygen levels and terrible pneumonia on chest X-rays.
We are only just beginning to understand why this is so. The coronavirus attacks lung cells that make surfactant. This substance helps the air sacs in the lungs stay open between breaths and is critical to normal lung function. As the inflammation from Covid pneumonia starts, it causes the air sacs to collapse, and oxygen levels fall. Yet the lungs initially remain ''compliant,'' not yet stiff or heavy with fluid. This means patients can still expel carbon dioxide -- and without a buildup of carbon dioxide, patients do not feel short of breath.
Share Your Stories From the Front Lines We want to hear from doctors, nurses and health care workers around the world.
Patients compensate for the low oxygen in their blood by breathing faster and deeper -- and this happens without their realizing it. This silent hypoxia, and the patient's physiological response to it, causes even more inflammation and more air sacs to collapse, and the pneumonia worsens until oxygen levels plummet. In effect, patients are injuring their own lungs by breathing harder and harder. Twenty percent of Covid pneumonia patients then go on to a second and deadlier phase of lung injury. Fluid builds up and the lungs become stiff, carbon dioxide rises, and patients develop acute respiratory failure.
By the time patients have noticeable trouble breathing and present to the hospital with dangerously low oxygen levels, many will ultimately require a ventilator.
Silent hypoxia progressing rapidly to respiratory failure explains cases of Covid-19 patients dying suddenly after not feeling short of breath. (It appears that most Covid-19 patients experience relatively mild symptoms and get over the illness in a week or two without treatment.)
A major reason this pandemic is straining our health system is the alarming severity of lung injury patients have when they arrive in emergency rooms. Covid-19 overwhelmingly kills through the lungs. And because so many patients are not going to the hospital until their pneumonia is already well advanced, many wind up on ventilators, causing shortages of the machines. And once on ventilators, many die.
Avoiding the use of a ventilator is a huge win for both patient and the health care system. The resources needed for patients on ventilators are staggering. Vented patients require multiple sedatives so that they don't buck the vent or accidentally remove their breathing tubes; they need intravenous and arterial lines, IV medicines and IV pumps. In addition to a tube in the trachea, they have tubes in their stomach and bladder. Teams of people are required to move each patient, turning them on their stomach and then their back, twice a day to improve lung function.
There is a way we could identify more patients who have Covid pneumonia sooner and treat them more effectively -- and it would not require waiting for a coronavirus test at a hospital or doctor's office. It requires detecting silent hypoxia early through a common medical device that can be purchased without a prescription at most pharmacies: a pulse oximeter.
Pulse oximetry is no more complicated than using a thermometer. These small devices turn on with one button and are placed on a fingertip. In a few seconds, two numbers are displayed: oxygen saturation and pulse rate. Pulse oximeters are extremely reliable in detecting oxygenation problems and elevated heart rates.
Pulse oximeters helped save the lives of two emergency physicians I know, alerting them early on to the need for treatment. When they noticed their oxygen levels declining, both went to the hospital and recovered (though one waited longer and required more treatment). Detection of hypoxia, early treatment and close monitoring apparently also worked for Boris Johnson, the British prime minister.
Widespread pulse oximetry screening for Covid pneumonia -- whether people check themselves on home devices or go to clinics or doctors' offices -- could provide an early warning system for the kinds of breathing problems associated with Covid pneumonia.
People using the devices at home would want to consult with their doctors to reduce the number of people who come to the E.R. unnecessarily because they misinterpret their device. There also may be some patients who have unrecognized chronic lung problems and have borderline or slightly low oxygen saturations unrelated to Covid-19.
All patients who have tested positive for the coronavirus should have pulse oximetry monitoring for two weeks, the period during which Covid pneumonia typically develops. All persons with cough, fatigue and fevers should also have pulse oximeter monitoring even if they have not had virus testing, or even if their swab test was negative, because those tests are only about 70 percent accurate. A vast majority of Americans who have been exposed to the virus don't know it.
There are other things we can do as well to avoid immediately resorting to intubation and a ventilator. Patient positioning maneuvers (having patients lie on their stomach and sides) open up the lower and posterior lungs most affected in Covid pneumonia. Oxygenation and positioning helped patients breathe easier and seemed to prevent progression of the disease in many cases. In a preliminary study by Dr. Caputo, this strategy helped keep three out of four patients with advanced Covid pneumonia from needing a ventilator in the first 24 hours.
To date, Covid-19 has killed more than 40,600 people nationwide -- more than 10,000 in New York State alone. Oximeters are not 100 percent accurate, and they are not a panacea. There will be deaths and bad outcomes that are not preventable. We don't fully understand why certain patients get so sick, or why some go on to develop multi-organ failure. Many elderly people, already weak with chronic illness, and those with underlying lung disease do very poorly with Covid pneumonia, despite aggressive treatment.
But we can do better. Right now, many emergency rooms are either being crushed by this one disease or waiting for it to hit. We must direct resources to identifying and treating the initial phase of Covid pneumonia earlier by screening for silent hypoxia.
It's time to get ahead of this virus instead of chasing it.
Richard Levitan, an emergency physician in Littleton, N.H., is president of Airway Cam Technologies, a company that teaches courses in intubation and airway management.






They can also reveal symptoms that at first went undetected. I may have found a new one.
Every day, millions of people around the world type their health symptoms into Google. We can use these searches to help detect unknown Covid-19 outbreaks, particularly in parts of the world with poor testing infrastructure.
To see the potential information lying in plain sight in Google data, consider searches for “I can’t smell.” There is now strong evidence that anosmia, or loss of smell, is a symptom of Covid-19, with some estimates suggesting that 30-60 percent of people with the disease experience this symptom. In the United States, in the week ending this past Saturday, searches for “I can’t smell” were highest in New York, New Jersey, Louisiana, and Michigan — four of the states with the highest prevalence of Covid-19. In fact, searches related to loss of smell during this period almost perfectly matched state-level disease prevalence rates, as the accompanying chart shows.
Vasileios Lampos, a computer scientist at University College London, and other researchers have found that a bevy of symptom-related searches — loss of smell as well as fever and shortness of breath — have tracked outbreaks around the world.
Because these searches correlate so strongly with disease prevalence rates in parts of the world with reasonably good testing, we can use these searches to try to find places where many positive cases are likely to have been missed.
Consider Ecuador. The official data says that while Ecuador has among the highest rates of Covid-19 cases per capita in South America, it has a lower case rate than the United States, Canada, Australia, Iran and most of Europe.
At the same time, Ecuadoreans are now making more searches related to loss of smell than any other country in the world, once you adjust for total Google searches. Searches for “no puedooler” (“I can’t smell”) are some 10 times higher per Google search in Ecuador than they are in Spain, even though Ecuador officially reports more than ten times fewer Covid-19 cases per capita than Spain does. Ecuadoreans are also right near the top in searches for fever, chills and diarrhea.
The search data, in other words, suggests that Ecuador may be even more of a Covid-19 epicenter than the official data says. That could help explain recent videos that have been shared on social media of bodies piled up on the street in Guayaquil, a port city in Ecuador.
While there does seem to be important information about Covid-19 prevalence in search data, we have to use great care in building models based on this data and learn from past attempts that tried to use this data to measure the geographic spread of different diseases.
In a 2009 paper that was published in Nature, researchers famously showed that Google searches related to the flu had been closely tracking weekly data on influenza rates from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Researchers used these search terms to build a model to try to help detect epidemics before the official data was collated.
Although the model did work initially, it struggled during the 2009 H1N1 flu pandemic. The problem was that flu was in the news so often, many people were searching for flu not because they were feeling symptoms but because they were feeling curiosity or fear. Concern about flu and Google searches about flu were more in the air than actual flu.
Recently, scholars have produced new methods to improve Google-based disease prevalence modeling and helped revive the influenza-tracking project. They have found that it is crucial to key in on the types of searches that are most likely to be reports of symptoms rather than searches related to news.
These tools are being used right now by researchers studying how searches might track Covid-19. Searches like “I can’t smell” are particularly useful because the form of the query suggests that someone may have the disease, whereas other queries related to loss of smell may instead suggest curiosity in the topic.
There is another way we can use search data during this pandemic: to better understand symptom patterns of the disease. Our understanding of the progression of symptoms of the disease is still developing. It took until March 20 for widespread reports of the relationship between Covid-19 and loss of smell to surface, even though it now appears to be among the most common symptoms.
There is already some evidence that clues to this symptom were evident earlier in search data. Joshua Gans, a professor at the Rotman School of Management at the University of Toronto, found that searches for “non sento odori” (“I can’t smell”) were elevated in Italy days before the symptom was reported in the news. Iran also saw an enormous rise in searches related to loss of smell weeks before media reports of the symptom became common.
This would not have been the first time symptom patterns were evident in search query patterns before they were fully recognized by the medical community. In 2016, researchers reported that subtle patterns of searches for symptoms could predict future pancreatic cancer patients. If a person searched for indigestion and later abdominal pain, for example, they were at risk of later searching “just diagnosed with pancreatic cancer.” Many of the precise timing patterns of symptoms leading to pancreatic cancer diagnoses were not previously understood.
I have spent the past decade as a data scientist studying how Google searches and other digital data sources can help us measure a range of social and behavioral outcomes. While I am not a medical expert, I was motivated by Professor Gans and others to explore whether Google searches might give clues of symptoms of Covid-19 that have not yet been officially reported. I think I have found a candidate symptom that might come with the disease for at least a small fraction of patients.
First, I downloaded state-level Google search data in the previous week for dozens of symptoms I gathered from medicinenet.com. Next, I measured which searches were most related to a state’s disease prevalence rate. In other words, I explored the question of which symptoms are now being searched in unusually high numbers in states with unusually high rates of Covid-19.
The three searches most related to Covid-19 disease rates were not a surprise: loss of smell, fever and chills. The fifth and sixth searches weren’t much of a surprise either: nasal congestion and diarrhea, which have also received a lot of attention as Covid-19 symptoms.
However, the fourth-place search was a surprise: eye pain, which has not garnered much attention as a possible symptom of the disease. Searches for “my eyes hurt” over the previous week were highest in New York, New Jersey, Connecticut, Louisiana and Michigan. Such searches seem to have risen in the past two weeks almost exclusively in parts of the country that have reached very high Covid-19 rates (although the data is fairly noisy and the rise isn’t as large as it is for some other symptoms).
There have been some reports of eye-related issues related to Covid-19. A March 31 paper based on a study of 38 patients in China reported that one third of the patients later tested for ocular irregularities. There have also been recent reports of pink eye in 1-3 percent of Covid-19 patients. Searches related to pink eye do not show nearly as strong a geographic relationship with Covid-19 rates as eye pain, though. In fact, all eye-related complaints except pain that I looked at show little-to-no relationship with Covid-19 rates.
Does the Google search data really mean that eye pain is a symptom of Covid-19? Not necessarily. There may be other reasons that people in these parts of the country are searching for eye pain. However, I tested alternative explanations that people suggested to me, and they did not fit the data. The searches do not seem to be driven by allergies; they are not related to pollen concentrations. Nor do they seem to be driven by people staying at home and staring at screens more; eye pain search rates do not correlate with data from cellphones that have measured recent reductions in movement.
It is hard to imagine that curiosity alone is driving the relationship between eye pain and Covid-19 prevalence rates. Other potential symptoms that have received extensive media attention don’t show nearly as strong a statewide relationship with Covid-19 prevalence rates.
There is also some evidence for eye pain as a symptom of Covid-19 from searches in other parts of the world. Notably, searches for eye pain rose above fourfold in Spain between the middle of February and the middle of March and rose about 50 percent in Iran in March. In Italy, searches for “bruciore occhi” (“burning eyes”) were five times their usual levels in March. (To examine data across the world, I am mostly using Google’s topic “eye pain,” which groups together many different searches in various languages related to the topic. Since Google reports different random samples of their data for different data requests, I have averaged a number of different samples.)
I think search data offers suggestive evidence that eye pain can be a symptom of the disease. However, it might only affect a small fraction of Covid-19 patients. Overall search volume for eye pain, despite rising substantially in Covid-19 hot spots, remains well below search volume for other symptoms. In New York there are now about one-sixth as many searches related to eye pain as there are searches related to loss of smell.
Nonetheless, doctors and public health officials should probably look closely at the relationship between Covid-19 and eye pain. If nothing else, we need to understand why there is frequently a large uptick in people telling Google that their eyes hurt when known cases of Covid-19 in a location rise to extremely high levels.
More people can study search trends around the world to help us learn about Covid-19. In 2006, Google released Google Trends, a public tool that the research community can use to study anonymous and aggregate search data. That is how I found everything I reported in this piece. It is plausible that important facts about the Covid-19 disease could be found here or in other large data sets by data scientists, medical experts or even amateur data sleuths.







How can we know when to reopen society without testing many more people?
President Trump said last week that he hadn’t “heard about testing in weeks.” But right now — let’s face it — tests are being rationed in many parts of the country.
Of course, the seriously ill and essential front-line personnel like doctors, nurses and policemen require and deserve to go to the front of the line for testing.
But there are hundreds of thousands more people who should have been tested at this point, if more tests were available. Testing them would have vastly changed their behavior, their self-care at home, and (perhaps most important) our understanding of Covid-19, so that when it flares locally we would know how to respond in a more nuanced way, rather than shutting society down.
As of this writing I know nearly a dozen people who are “presumed Covid.” None of them were tested, because they were not sick enough to be admitted to a hospital — though all were quite symptomatic. Here’s a partial list:
Three 20-something roommates in Brooklyn, two with mild symptoms. One sick enough to visit a hospital, short of breath. No tests. All were told, “Assume you have it.”
Also “presumed Covid”: a colleague’s daughter and her boyfriend, though he had a rough two-week course, including pneumonia. His oxygen levels, measured at home, never got quite bad enough for admission (and hence, no testing).
And finally, a reporter in San Francisco, who went to a clinic with high fever, total body aches and cough, is now “presumed Covid.” She was sent home. The next day her strep test came back positive. “Assume you have Covid, too,” she was told.
It is true that a positive Covid test would not have changed any of their immediate medical treatment. They got inhalers and the medicines they needed. Not knowing probably didn’t increase their risk of death. So I don’t fault the doctors for not administering them tests at a time of limited resources.
But here is what is outrageous: This resource should not be in such limited supply three months into a global outbreak. Widespread testing has hugely important impact, not just for individuals, but also for society.
For example, If people knew they’d had Covid, and therefore possessed at least some immunity, they could volunteer, once fully recovered, for groups like Meals on Wheels, which is struggling to deliver food to people who can’t — even in the best of times — fend for themselves. They could serve as helpers in nursing homes, whose staffs are stretched thin and where the elderly are living in isolation.
Knowing the result of a test allows rational individual decisions. If a person living in a house with others knows whether he has Covid versus a common cold (and remember, the symptoms of Covid-19 may be very mild in younger people), it greatly affects how he interacts with family and housemates.
If he is Covid positive, it makes sense for him to totally isolate in one room and use a separate bathroom. An elderly relative might be moved out. If he has a common cold, less disruptive precautions are needed.
In this season of allergies — sneezes and sniffles — and when the country is trying to control the spread of a virus that can produce only mild symptoms in many of those infected, it would be good to be able to test as many “essential workers” — broadly defined — as possible to see if they had Covid-19.
This is not just a reference to health care workers, police and firefighters or utility workers. It is also not helpful for a food delivery person or the guy at the grocery counter, for example, to work with it, given how many people are depending on their services.
We test for things like strep and sexually transmitted diseases not just because knowing test results influences treatment — should antibiotics be prescribed? — but also because the results influence the care and advice for patients’ activities and contacts.
Finally, and perhaps most important, widespread testing of all those “presumed Covid” patients who are not hospitalized gives us a far clearer picture of this new viral disease, which we currently have so little data about.
It would allow us to calculate how many people who are infected with the virus get really ill and how many die (the true case fatality rate). We are now more or less clueless about those things, and because of uneven testing, fatality rates vary widely from city to city, state to state and country to country.
Finally, widespread testing would allow us to have a better sense of how transmissible the virus is after more casual contact. We know that the intense exposure of health care personnel in a hospital setting often leads to transmission. But what about the co-worker who sat across the office from you and rarely interacted with you?
Long after his graduate school classes were canceled, my son was belatedly notified that one person in his German class had fallen ill with Covid-19. How many others did, but were never tested?
After this period of lockdown, Covid-19 is likely to come back in lesser waves, and robust testing data would be hugely important in fashioning a targeted response that could be less expansive than the miserable and economically devastating shutdown we are now experiencing. If one student falls ill in a class, should universities once again send all students home and cancel a semester — or just close a building? Or even just cancel one class?
Thank goodness that countries like South Korea are doing far more testing that we are, which might give us clues how to respond. But we should be doing much more ourselves.
There have been countless explanations for the lack of tests. Our public health labs are not primed to do testing and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention was slow to react to a virus many knew was likely to come our way. The agency initially distributed test kits like Senate seats — equally to each state lab, rather than where they were most needed. Then the first test kits didn’t work.
The list goes on. The Food and Drug Administration only belatedly allowed private and university labs to contribute without the normal regulatory tape. There was a shortage of swabs and a shortage of personal protective equipment for people taking the swabs. Most recently, an Abbott quick test device that Mr. Trump had applauded as a solution — “a whole new ballgame” — turned out to be only 5,500 tests, distributed nationally. Yet many millions are needed.
All are plausible explanations and many are true. But no one should be satisfied with them in this, the richest country in the world.
There are concerns, to be sure, about the accuracy of the new tests, with reports of false negatives. But that is no reason not to use what we have; the specificity of newly developed tests can improve with understanding and use. It would be wise for people who test negative to continue rigorously following good Covid hygiene. But it would be a mistake to not expand testing aggressively simply because of reports of false negatives.
“Presumed positive” may be needed during a period of rationing and shortage. But “Assume you’re positive” as so many New Yorkers are doing is not good individual health care — or good policy.






Not having an accurate, honest, nationwide way to tally Covid-19 cases will only add to the current tragedy.
We recently received the death certificate for my mother, who died May 4 in an assisted-living facility near New York City. ''Acute Respiratory Distress Syndrome'' was the primary cause. And the secondary -- no surprise -- was ''suspected Covid-19.''
The White House, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the states are debating the proper theoretical (and politically beneficial) way to tally Covid-19 deaths. One group, led by President Trump, feels the current tally is too high. The other, including Dr. Anthony Fauci, the nation's top infectious disease expert, thinks it may be an underestimate.
Though my mother almost certainly died of Covid (she met the clinical case definition), her death was, as far as I can tell, not counted -- and certainly will not be counted if the White House gets its way. Unfortunately, counting Covid deaths and cases has been turned into a battle of semantics, chance, bureaucracy, politics and immediate circumstance, rather than science.
And we are fooling ourselves: Not having an accurate, standard, honest, nationwide way to tally Covid cases will only add to the current tragedy.
First of all, states, agencies and workplaces are all counting differently, sometimes bending, I suspect, to political convenience: At first both the C.D.C. and New York State required a positive test to count as a Covid death. Later each decided to add, for some purposes, cases from senior care facilities where ''presumed'' or ''assumed'' Covid was listed on a death certificate, or when a doctor deemed it was the probable cause of death.
But what of ''suspected Covid-19,'' the term on my mom's death certificate? Almost certainly not. Jill Montag, a spokeswoman for the New York Department of Health, explained: ''The case count for deaths of residents in nursing homes and adult care facilities includes presumed (as determined by a physician) Covid-19 deaths.''
And how did the hospice doctor, who had never physically seen my mother, determine what word to use? Did she mean to draw a distinction between ''presumed'' and ''suspected''? As a doctor who filled out these forms during the AIDS epidemic in New York, I know it's often a quick and arbitrary process, not bound by rules; generally the primary cause is listed as cardiopulmonary or respiratory arrest, with secondary and tertiary causes after that. If a patient also had pneumonia and diabetes, Covid might not even make the cut.
Indeed, May 16 Colorado said it would not count nearly 300 people who had tested positive but did not have Covid listed on a death certificate.
Let me explain how Covid played out in my mother's final month of life: Shortly after she turned 96 in March, she spiked a temperature of 102, raising alarms. Although the facility had gone into lockdown weeks earlier, we knew it had several confirmed cases among residents. The doctor first checked her urine and skin. All were clear. But a chest X-ray showed bilateral pneumonia, and the next day she had a dry cough. Exposure+fever+cough+bilateral infiltrates = Covid.
Had she gone to a hospital and needed admission, she would have been Covid tested and counted. But she didn't want aggressive treatment, such as a ventilator, and she was not in pain or struggling to breathe. So she stayed in her apartment.
Because my mother was ''presumed Covid,'' the geriatrician started standard outpatient Covid treatment: azithromycin and supplemental oxygen, as needed.
But the third reason she was not tested is, from a public health standpoint, disturbing: Many of the people who might have mandated or performed a Covid test at that point do not really want to know if patients like her have Covid or not.
Not testing or transparently reporting Covid cases is a great way to keep numbers low. As President Trump said when he balked at having American passengers come ashore from an infected cruise ship on March 7, ''I like the numbers being where they are.''
For states, avoiding robust testing and reporting is a good way to make sure new cases decrease for 14 days (a C.D.C. recommendation for reopening). But it deprives those same states of crucial information for rational decisions.
The data scientist who designed Florida's Covid reporting system was fired recently because, she said, she had made it too transparent for her superiors in the state's health department.
For assisted-living facilities, nursing homes and other businesses, there is pressure not to know. Who wants to be known as a place where 20, 30 or 50 percent of the residents or workers have gotten Covid? With tremendous pressure to resume business as usual, those with high numbers are pilloried and branded -- even though many facilities (including my mom's) did what seemed like a heroic job trying to keep their residents safe and even feeling loved when their real families could not be there.
By not testing residents like my mom, her facility could report for weeks that it had only four positive cases on the premises -- even though that might not reflect the underlying reality.
What we need instead is a single and clear national testing strategy: for who must be tested, when and with which test.
On the morning of March 9, the last day I saw my mother, the facility had gone into lockdown, unknown to me. The director, kindly, brought my mom out to the garden so we could have a socially distant visit, before an unknown length of confinement.
Two weeks later she was ''suspected Covid,'' in isolation and on hospice care. I didn't pester for an official test then. I was simply grateful for the compassionate care the staff was clearly struggling to provide: The daily updates from the director; the texts and calls quickly answered from the geriatrician; the sweet message left by the head nurse on her floor, whom she loved, reporting on her mood and condition.
The day after my mother died, I gently asked her physician if she had ever been tested. The facility had done some internal sampling, but not my mother.
My mom was 96, frail and declining, though she had no chronic conditions per se. Covid was not a terrible way for her to pass. But that doesn't mean her death shouldn't be counted for what it was. Cataloging deaths like hers would make our ''numbers'' look worse, yes. But it would also greatly add to our knowledge of how this virus spreads and affects patients, as we try to develop a coherent strategic reaction.
My mother had a long and meaningful life. Being counted would give her premature death meaning as well.





The reported numbers leave out thousands of deaths clearly resulting from the pandemic.
Many supporters of President Trump believe that the figures for coronavirus fatalities are inflated, and Trump himself shared a tweet doubting the accuracy of some virus figures.
He's right that the death toll seems off -- but not in the direction he would suggest. We've crunched the numbers, state by state, and it appears that somewhere around 100,000 to 110,000 Americans have already died as a result of the pandemic, rather than the 83,000 whose deaths have been attributed to the disease, Covid-19.
That's my estimate reached with the help of a Harvard statistician, Rafael Irizarry, based on a comparison of death rates this spring with those in previous years. Some states have been largely unaffected -- death rates in some even appear to have dropped, perhaps because of less driving and fewer car accidents -- but others have seen huge surges in deaths.
Over all, in a bit more than two months, the United States lost more Americans to the coronavirus than died over seven decades in the Korean, Vietnam, Persian Gulf, Afghanistan and Iraq Wars.
Here's how we reached our estimates; they are not definitive, for they are based on preliminary data, and I invite discussion.
The starting point is that the cause of death is often uncertain. Most people who die don't get an autopsy, and many never had a coronavirus test. The precise number who died from Covid-19 is in some sense unknowable.
Still, one standard approach to measure the impact of a pandemic like this is to look at ''excess deaths,'' meaning mortality greater than the average for a particular time period.
For example, for the seven weeks ending April 25 in the United States, about 70,000 more Americans died than is normal for those weeks (death is seasonal and normally declines over the course of spring and summer). That 70,000 figure for excess deaths does not include Connecticut, North Carolina and Pennsylvania, which were excluded because of missing or dubious data.
The official number of Covid-19 deaths in that period for the rest of the country was 49,100. That suggests an undercount of more than 20,000 coronavirus-related deaths as of April 25.
Add those 20,000 missed deaths to today's total of 83,000, and you already get more than 100,000 pandemic-related deaths. But the undercount probably continued after April 25, albeit at a lower rate.
We don't have good enough mortality data to assess excess deaths in late April and early May, a period in which more than 30,000 Americans are reported to have died of Covid-19. Testing increased significantly, and over time doctors seemed more willing to list Covid-19 as the cause of death.
''There's probably less underreporting as time goes on,'' notes Robert N. Anderson, the chief of mortality statistics at the C.D.C.'s National Center for Health Statistics. In New York City, a study likewise found enormous underreporting in the first half of April, then gradually diminishing by the beginning of May.
In the period we looked at, the undercount also diminished. Initially, there were more than twice as many excess deaths as reported coronavirus deaths, but by April 25 there were only 40 percent more. If the undercount thereafter were 10 percent, that would add a few thousand to the total, possibly bringing it closer to 110,000.
These numbers are uncertain, but the implication is that somewhere around 25,000 more Americans died as a result of the pandemic than are recorded in the death tallies.
This kind of analysis can't determine if they died directly from the virus or indirectly. Some presumably perished from heart attacks or strokes because they feared going to hospitals and delayed calling 911, or because ambulance services were stretched thin. In other words, a modest number presumably died because of the virus without being infected by it.
One reason to think that a great majority of the excess deaths are directly caused by the virus is that in some states that seem to have meticulous reporting, such as Massachusetts, the number of excess deaths and the number of Covid-19 deaths are not so far apart.
Professor Irizarry, who is also chairman of the department of data science at Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston, notes that our new estimates are built on several layers of uncertainty. It typically takes two months for deaths to be reported in a reasonably complete way, so one critical issue is how to adjust for lags in reporting. The C.D.C. tries to estimate what the death total will eventually be based on incomplete reporting, and our estimates depend on its algorithms.
The mortality figures show enormous variation by state. Texas and California appear to have suffered more deaths from the 2018 flu epidemic than from the coronavirus so far. And according to the C.D.C. numbers, some states, including Arkansas, Hawaii, Iowa, Kansas, North Dakota, Oregon, South Dakota and Rhode Island, actually experienced fewer deaths than normal in the seven weeks ending April 25. The reason might be a decline in driving and a drop in accidental deaths.
Irizarry calculates that about 70 percent of excess deaths nationally derive from just five states: New York, New Jersey, Michigan, Massachusetts and Illinois.
The idea that official figures are undercounts is widely acknowledged. Dr. Anthony S. Fauci told a Senate health committee on Tuesday that he didn't know if the real death toll was 50 percent higher than the official figures, but that ''almost certainly it's higher.''
''Most frontline doctors will tell you that the numbers are grossly underreported,'' said Michael P. Jones, an emergency medicine physician who works at hospitals in the Bronx that were particularly hard hit. Especially in the early days, he said, many Covid-19 deaths were simply listed as some variant of ''respiratory failure'' or ''multisystem organ failure.''
Dr. Alicia Skarimbas, who practices in New Jersey, said, ''We signed so many death certificates, we would get behind and take turns doing them.''
Skarimbas said that she would list Covid-19 as the cause of death when that seemed obvious, but her partners might simply list ''respiratory failure'' unless there had been a positive test for the virus. Thus it was often random whether Covid-19 was listed as the cause of death.
The undercounting is a global problem, not just one in the United States. Dr. Christopher Murray of the Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation at the University of Washington estimates that globally, excess deaths are about double the official Covid-19 death counts.
Excess deaths are often used to gauge mortality from an event or an epidemic. When Hurricane Maria struck Puerto Rico in 2017, the official death toll stood for a year at 64. But Irizarry and other scholars used a variety of techniques to calculate that excess deaths in the aftermath exceeded 1,000, perhaps by a wide margin. As a result of the statistical work, the official death toll is now 2,975.
Covid-19 will inevitably continue to kill people in the weeks ahead. Those who die over the next week or two have already been infected, perhaps several weeks ago. Dr. Tom Frieden, a former director of the C.D.C., notes that even if one could end all new infections, thousands would still die from infections already contracted.
Given the uncertainty and the lags in data, why go through this exercise of estimating deaths? Because flawed numbers based on an undercount are already a central part of the discussion, informing policy decisions, and Trump has made them so.
''We have saved thousands and thousands of lives,'' he said on May 1. ''Hopefully, we are going to come in below that 100,000 lives lost.'' In that context, it seems worthwhile to note that this milestone has already been exceeded.






Psychologists say anxiety and uncertainty prompt irrational decisions — like turning down a transplant when an organ becomes available.
It was the call Lance Hansen, gravely ill with liver disease, had been waiting weeks for, and it came just before midnight in late April. A liver was available for him. He got up to get dressed for the three-hour drive to San Francisco for the transplant surgery.
And then he panicked.
“Within five minutes after hanging up, he started hyperventilating,” his wife, Carmen, said. “He kept saying: ‘I’m going to get Covid, and then I’m going to die. And if I die, I want my family there.’ I couldn’t believe what I was hearing.”
She promised she would wait outside the hospital, as patients’ families were barred from entering. She warned that he might not get another chance at a new liver before it was too late. She told him he could die if he didn’t go. Still, Mr. Hansen, 59, refused.
In a world seeded with anxiety, fear is gripping not just people who are ill with the coronavirus but those in urgent need of other medical care. Even as the number of Covid-19 cases declines in many places, patients with cancer, heart disease and strokes, among others, are delaying or forgoing critical procedures that could keep them alive. And as the virus reignites in pockets of the country, people are ignoring symptoms altogether, afraid to set foot in emergency rooms or even doctors’ offices.
Under orders from their states, many hospitals canceled elective surgeries like hip replacements as Covid-19 cases soared. Now most are gradually allowing the resumption of elective surgeries. But for these, as well as for more time-sensitive procedures like cardiac catheterizations, cancer surgery and blood tests or CT scans to monitor serious chronic conditions, doctors now find themselves spending hours on the phone trying to coax terrified patients to come in.
In a review of its claim and pre-authorization data for seven acute conditions, including heart attacks, appendicitis and aortic aneurysms, the insurance company Cigna Corporation found declines ranging from 11 percent for acute coronary syndromes to 35 percent for atrial fibrillation in the rate of hospitalizations over a recent two-month period. In a study published Tuesday in   The New England Journal of Medicine, Kaiser Permanente reported a drop of nearly 50 percent in heart attack admissions in its Northern California hospitals.
At the University of Rochester Medical Center in Rochester, N.Y., emergency room visits dropped by 50 percent, and many of the patients who do come have waited too long to seek treatment. They “are presenting late with strokes and heart attacks,” said Dr. Michael Apostolakos, the system’s chief medical officer. “Or they’re not showing up until they can barely breathe from heart failure.”
In Newark, emergency medical services teams made 239 on-scene death pronouncements in April, a fourfold increase from April 2019. Fewer than half of those additional deaths could be attributed directly to Covid-19, said Dr. Shereef Elnahal, president and chief executive of Newark’s University Hospital.
Declining crucial, potentially lifesaving treatment might seem irrational. Mental health experts explain that anxiety affects the part of the brain involved in thinking and planning for the future. It arises when that part, the prefrontal cortex, doesn’t have enough information to accurately predict what lies ahead, causing the brain to spin scenarios of dread.
Enter panic.
“If you have anxiety and then you exacerbate that by watching the news and reading social media, that’s where you get panicked,” said Dr. Jud Brewer, a psychiatrist and behavioral neuroscientist at Brown University. “And the rational, thinking parts of the brain stop functioning well when we’re panicked.”
Panic, in turn, can lead to impulsive behavior and dangerous decisions, Dr. Brewer and others said.
“People are saying: ‘So I’m having a heart attack. I’m going to stay home. I’m not going to die in that hospital,’” said Dr. Marlene Millen, a primary care physician at the University of California, San Diego. “I’ve actually heard that a few times.”
Dr. Suzanne George, an oncologist at the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute in Boston, has patients on oral chemotherapy regimens who refuse to come in for lab work. Cancer patients on chemotherapy are at particularly high risk of becoming severely ill if they contract the coronavirus.
“They don’t want to leave their house so we can take tests to ensure that they’re receiving their chemotherapy safely,” Dr. George said, adding that blood tests are crucial for early detection of potentially severe side effects.
Dr. George said the fear she was seeing a few weeks ago had abated slightly. Still, she said, “we will all need to come together to help people feel safe.”
Most hospitals and outpatient clinics have made changes designed to keep patients and staff members safe. Many are testing patients and certain workers. In many hospitals, Covid-19 patients are kept in separate units. Masks are usually mandated for both patients and clinicians. Cleaning protocols have been turbocharged. As a result, experts say, the risk of acquiring Covid-19 when going into a hospital is very low.
But one of the common safety measures — banning visitors, even close family members — is a huge reason for patients’ fear and apprehension.
“The hospital was an ominous, nerve-racking and scary place for patients even before Covid,” said Dr. Lisa VanWagner, a transplant hepatologist at Northwestern Medicine in Chicago. “Now you take a stressful situation like a pandemic and you tell people that they cannot have their normal support system while they’re in the hospital, and that really magnifies those fears.”
Transplant specialists around the country describe patients like Mr. Hansen, 59, who turn down organs because they are worried about being exposed to Covid-19 patients or because they cannot have a close relative or friend with them in the hospital.
David Rivera, 54, who has liver cancer, declined a liver in late March at Northwestern. In an interview, he said he feared the deceased donor could be infected with the virus.
Dr. VanWagner, who is on the transplant team at Northwestern, said Mr. Rivera had turned down the liver despite being told the donor had tested negative for Covid-19. Still, the hospital could not guarantee that the liver was free of the coronavirus, though Dr. VanWagner and others said the chances that a liver donor who had tested negative would transmit the virus to a recipient were exceedingly low.
Dr. VanWagner said Mr. Rivera needed a transplant before his cancer could progress. “His window is closing,” she said. “You can only go so long before you run out of chances.”
Mr. Hansen said he now regretted the decision he made last month and would accept the next liver that became available.
“I just freaked out,” Mr. Hansen said by phone recently, his voice weak and faint. “I should have gone, but I just freaked out.”
Health system administrators are redoubling their efforts to convince patients that it’s safe to come into hospitals and outpatient clinics, even as testingfor hospital personnel and patients remains spotty.
“Our goal is to spend almost all our marketing dollars over the next year around the safety of our institution,” said Dr. Stephen Klasko, chief executive of Jefferson Health, a 14-hospital system based in Philadelphia.
Some doctors are helping patients with chronic illnesses rethink aspects of their care.
For the past 21 years, Rob Russo, 45, has been living with a rare type of gastrointestinal cancer that has spread to his liver. For years, he made regular trips from his home in Queens to Dana-Farber in Boston. When the pandemic hit, Mr. Russo’s oncologist helped him transfer much of his care to Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center and NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell Medical Center in New York.
At the end of April, Mr. Russo needed a procedure at Weill Cornell to unclog a stent that was keeping his biliary duct open. Before the procedure, Mr. Russo’s mind churned with scenarios: The place was teeming with the virus. What if someone with asymptomatic coronavirus infected him, and he needed to be hospitalized? And what if that meant never seeing his wife again?
“She could drop me off, and it’s the last time we’d see each other,” he said.
Like others interviewed for this story, Mr. Russo found that once he had arrived at the hospital, he felt safe. Multiple safety precautions were taken. The procedure went well. But before the procedure, he was tested for the coronavirus. The test came back positive. Now he’s quarantined on a separate floor in his house.
Mary Anne Oldford, 72, who has an advanced form of sarcoma, a rare cancer, runs an online support group called the Sarcoma Sunflower Brigade. Members make a point of not bringing up Covid-19, but when Ms. Oldford asked them recently to weigh in on their anxiety related to the coronavirus, she got responses that illustrated various shades of sheer terror. One woman told the group that every time she has to go in for a scan, or blood work, “I have a borderline meltdown.”
Ms. Oldford, who herself has been terrified to go for blood tests, came up with a solution for herself. She found a clinic that agreed to do her blood draws at home.
She advises others in the support group to push for effective alternatives. “If you’re afraid and you’re frozen, you have to somehow reach out and just say, ‘Please help me figure out how to do this so that I’m not so scared,’” she said.
Bill Sieber, a psychologist at U.C.S.D., said the key for fearful patients was to develop a semblance of control over their predicament. “Control is key,” Dr. Sieber said. “If you can’t control the fact that your spouse can’t come into the recovery room, ask what you can control.”
Dr. Sieber also recommended working through episodes of panic with breathing. “We can control our breathing in a major way,” he said. “Breathing signals the brain to calm down.” One step he suggested was taking one extra second to prolong an exhalation.
Controlled breathing helped Megan Jennings. Ms. Jennings, 36, who lives near Seattle, was determined to save the life of her 7-year-old niece, who has a congenital liver disease, by donating a portion of her own liver.
It was a fraught decision not just for Ms. Jennings but also for the University of Washington transplant team.
“This child was getting sicker, and we had to make a decision whether we would move forward with bringing a live donor into our hospital, which had a lot of Covid at what turned out to be the peak of our surge,” said Dr. Scott Biggins, chief of hepatology at UW Medicine.
Ms. Jennings used a variety of breathing techniques to overcome a standing fear of hospitals and surgery, now compounded by a dread of the coronavirus.
“Being able to slow my breathing, feeling my body, and ground myself, staying mindful of what was happening around me, helped me stop my brain from rattling off craziness,” Ms. Jennings said. The surgery lasted seven hours.
After a five-day hospital stay, with no visitors, she was finally discharged. But a few days after she returned home, her wound became infected, and she had no choice but to return to the hospital to have the incision reopened and cleaned. The doctors in the emergency room recommended that she spend the night in the hospital, but there was a limit to how much anxiety she could tolerate. She insisted that she be shown how to care for the wound at home.
“There was no way I was going to be admitted,” she said, and she left the hospital at 3:30 a.m.
Sleep-deprived and foggy from a painkiller, she slept for two hours in her car. Then she drove herself home.





Long dissatisfied with the doctor treating his diabetes, Reginald Relf decided to fight through whatever was causing his nagging cough. But then his temperature spiked and his breathing became so labored that he reluctantly took his sister’s advice to visit a doctor.
The staff at an urgent care clinic in suburban Chicago sent him home, without testing him for Covid-19 but after advising him to quarantine.
So Mr. Relf, a 50-year-old African-American engineer, settled into his mother’s basement. A week later, after he was found dead, his sister, Ami Relf, was left shaken.
“When I finally get him to go to seek help, he’s turned away,” she said. “If he was a middle-aged white woman, would they have turned her away? Those are questions that haunt me.”
The coronavirus has left tens of thousands of grief-stricken American families struggling to make sense of the seemingly random terror it inflicts, sickening many but only taking some lives.
But for many black families, mourning coronavirus deaths brings an added burden as they wonder whether racial bias may have played a role.
Decades of research shows that black patients receive inferior medical care to white patients. A long history of experimentation, exploitation and mistreatment has left many African-Americans deeply suspicious of the medical establishment. Now comes Covid-19, and the fear among many families, social scientists and public health experts that racial bias might be contributing to the disproportionately high rate at which the novel coronavirus is killing African-Americans.
Acknowledging a history of implicit bias in medical care, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recently advised health care professionals to be careful not to let bias influencetheir treatment during this pandemic.
Preliminary research by a Boston-based biotech firm suggests that treatment may not be consistent across the board. The study found that black people who visited hospitals with Covid-19 symptoms in February and March were less likely to get tested or treated than white patients.
Americans of all races may have experienced less than ideal care in recent months in an overwhelmed health care system, and it is not uncommon to hear stories of people who visited health professionals for treatment, only to be turned away.
But African-American patients enter the health care system with distinct disadvantages, experts say. There is less access to quality health care in many black communities, research shows, and black people are more likely to suffer from diabetes, hypertension and other underlying conditions that make Covid-19 particularly fatal.
So, should providers misinterpret or ignore coronavirus symptoms in black patients, there is a higher likelihood that the results could be grave, experts say.
The country’s largest professional organization representing black doctors is calling on federal health agencies to study the role bias may have played in the testing and treatment of African-Americans for Covid-19.
“I think what we will find is race is a factor,” said Dr. Oliver Brooks, president of the organization, the National Medical Association.
In previous studies, doctors have been found to have downplayed African-Americans’ complaints of pain, given them weaker pain medication for broken bones and withheld cardiac treatments from black patients who needed them. Research suggests that the decisions are the result of ingrained assumptions, cultural ignorance and hostile attitudes toward African-Americans.
The C.D.C. said in a statement to The New York Times that it did not have data to quantify the role of implicit bias in Covid-19 deaths. But the agency added, “Becoming aware of and reflecting on one’s own biases to help ensure they do not impact decisions is a potentially lifesaving step for clinicians to undertake.”
When Ms. Relf made an appointment for her brother at the Loyola Center for Immediate Care in River Forest, Ill., in late March, she said she was hopeful that the clinic would be able to test and treat him for the coronavirus. He had become extremely lethargic with persistent coughs and chills, she said.
Before Mr. Relf left the clinic, he called his sister complaining that the staff would not test him because he did not have a fever. He sounded defeated, Ms. Relf said.
“Quarantine at home for 7 days,” his discharge papers said. “Infection control will contact you regarding eligibility for testing.”
The clinic set up an appointment for him to see his regular doctor 11 days later. Mr. Relf never made it. One of his brothers went to check on him after he stopped answering his phone and found his lifeless body crumpled in front of a couch. A posthumous test confirmed that Mr. Relf had Covid-19.
A spokeswoman for Loyola Medicine said in an email that privacy laws prevented it from discussing Mr. Relf’s case specifically, but that Loyola did not “discriminate based on race, age, gender or socioeconomic status.”
It is difficult to know if any individual medical decision was affected by bias.
Still, a 2003 report commissioned by Congress on racial and ethnic disparities in health care found that even controlling for income and insurance access, “Racial and ethnic minorities tend to receive a lower quality of health care.”
“Significantly,” the report added, “these differences are associated with greater mortality among African-American patients.”
A pilot study by Rubix Life Sciences, the biotech research firm, compared the severity of Covid-19 symptoms exhibited by more than 27,000 patients during hospital visits in seven states with the treatment they received.
The study, which has not gone through peer review, showed that black patients were six times less likely to get treatment or testing than white patients, said Reginald Swift, the founder of Rubix.
Dr. Brooks, medical director at Watts Healthcare in Los Angeles, explained the issue this way: “When we walk into an E.R., what they sometimes see is not a patient who is suffering from respiratory illness, they see a black man here who needs something.”
Gary Fowler’s family believes that the minimizing of his symptoms by doctors ultimately cost him his life.
Mr. Fowler, 56, who is black, had developed a deep, worrying cough, a fever and labored breathing, said one of his sons, Keith Gambrell. Over the course of five days, Mr. Fowler was sent homeby three hospitals in metro Detroit, Mr. Gambrell said. A week later, Mr. Fowler died sitting in a blue recliner in his bedroom. He tested positive for the coronavirus after his death.
The three hospitals where his family said he sought care disagreed with the family’s account. A spokesman from one of the hospitals, Detroit Receiving Hospital, said, “there is no record of this individual coming to Detroit Receiving Hospital for any type of treatment.” The other two hospitals disputed that Mr. Fowler was denied care.
Mr. Fowler’s death added to the grim tally of deaths in Detroit, a city with a majority African-American population that has come to tragically symbolize the virus’s devastation of black America.
Kaila Corrothers believed that her mother, Deborah Gatewood, did not have to be part of that tally.
Ms. Gatewood, 63, developed a high fever in mid March. But in four visits over six days, she was sent home with nothing more than Tylenol and cough medicine from the suburban Detroit hospital where she worked as a phlebotomist for 31 years, her daughter said.
Days after that last visit, Ms. Gatewood became so weak at home that her daughter insisted she go to the hospital again.
“No, they’re not going to take me,” Ms. Corrothers recalled her mother saying.
But Ms. Gatewood collapsed and an ambulance rushed her to a different hospital, where she tested positive for the coronavirus and was placed on a ventilator.
On April 17, three weeks after being admitted, her heart, kidney and lungs failed, and she died.
Ms. Corrothers said she could not say whether the fact that her mother was African-American played a role in her treatment.
In her visits to the emergency room of her employer, Beaumont Hospital in Farmington Hills, Mich., Ms. Gatewood never presented with symptoms severe enough to warrant admission, a hospital spokesman said in a statement. Given the shortage of testing supplies, patients with mild symptoms were not tested and told to quarantine at home, but return if their condition deteriorated, the statement said.
The lack of resources in some hospitals and the overwhelming number of cases likely have played more of a role than bias in the negative outcomes for African-Americans, some public health experts said.
But, in another case that has raised concern of medical bias, the family of Robert Johnson Jr. cannot help but think that doctors could have done more for him.
He seemed to embody many coronavirus risk factors: 49 and black, he had diabetes, hypertension, a low-functioning kidney and a double amputation.
The day before Easter, he woke up too weak to leave his bed, eat, or tell his mother what precisely hurt.
The next morning, Mr. Johnson’s fever soared to 103.3 degrees. He was rushed to the emergency room at Yale New Haven Hospital. His mother, Gloria Johnson, 71, called the hospital hours later and was told her son had been given “the green light” to return home after receiving a chest X-ray that showed signs of pneumonia. The hospital did not test him for the coronavirus.
Ms. Johnson brought her son Easter dinner that night after his discharge. He had no appetite but she insisted he taste a few spoonfuls of yams. When she called the following morning to check on him, he didn’t answer.
She hurried to his apartment only to find him unresponsive in his bed. Ms. Johnson watched as emergency responders tried to revive him.
“I thought, ‘Oh my God, what if they had given him the Covid-19 test or even kept him overnight for observation? What would the outcome be?’” she said.
The medical examiner confirmed that Mr. Johnson had died of complications from the coronavirus and diabetes, Ms. Johnson said.
A spokesman for Yale New Haven Health said in a statement that they “understand the family’s concern.” The hospital was confident in the care provided to Mr. Johnson, but his case was under review, the spokesman said.
After Mr. Johnson’s burial in a graveside service in New Haven, his mother was preparing to have his old apartment packed and cleaned when she received one last call from the Yale hospital.
They were calling, she said, to schedule Mr. Johnson’s Covid-19 test.





There is new evidence that some children may become very sick, and we are beginning to learn more about who may be most at risk and what parents need to watch for.
As we learn more about children and Covid-19, new research is reshaping some of our thinking. It continues to be true that children, as a group, have been relatively spared, but there is evidence that some may become very sick, and we are beginning to learn more about who may be most at risk, and what parents need to watch for.
This past week there were reports of children hospitalized in different locations, including New York City, with a multisystem inflammatory disease that has killed three children. In addition, new research continues to be published describing the ways that the virus can behave in children, which is not always how it behaves in adults.
[Read more: The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s list of coronavirus symptoms in children]
A clinical report published Tuesday in Frontiers in Pediatrics describes five children in China who were admitted to the hospital with nonrespiratory symptoms but who turned out to have Covid, including the characteristic lung abnormalities. Dr. Wenbin Li, chief pediatrician of Tongji Hospital in Wuhan, who was the first author of the study, said in an email, “In our report, four of the five patients had fever and cough during the course of the disease; four of the five cases had digestive tract symptoms as the first manifestation.”
“The indisputable fact is that, during the outbreak of Covid-19, the pediatric emergency departments are having a huge reduction of visits,” Dr. Li wrote. Because parents are afraid of coming to the hospital, they may delay bringing sick children in, which can lead to serious complications, he said. And we’re seeing in the United States that they may also delay bringing well children in, which can lead to missed immunizationsand vulnerability to other scary diseases.
“The idea that children either don’t get Covid-19 or have really mild disease is an oversimplification,” said Dr. Adam Ratner, the director of pediatric infectious diseases at New York University School of Medicine and Hassenfeld Children’s Hospital at N.Y.U. Langone Health. It’s true — and comforting — that there have been fewer cases detected in children, and that the case fatality rate is much lower in children than in adults, especially older adults, he said, but “we have had some extremely sick children.”
A study just published in the journal JAMA Pediatricslooked at 48 children in the United States who have required intensive care with Covid-19. Among other findings, 40 of them had significant medical issues, so-called comorbidities; half of these were categorized as “medically complex,” meaning they were dependent on technological support to begin with, as would be true of a child with a tracheostomy, for example. Other comorbidities included immunosuppression, usually connected to cancer treatment, obesity or diabetes.
There have also been some cases of newborns becoming sick, and at least one reported stillbirth, and a research letter published at the end of April in JAMA reported the isolation of the virus from the placenta of a woman who suffered a second-trimester miscarriage.
Dr. David Baud, the head of the obstetrics service at Lausanne University Hospital in Switzerland, who was the lead author of the letter, said that the most likely way for the virus to reach the placenta is through the bloodstream. He noted that in the outbreaks of SARS and MERS, which were also coronaviruses, infected mothers were more likely to have low birth weight babies.
And although it feels as if the current pandemic has been going on for a long time, we are in fact not far enough in yet to see what the effect on the fetus might be of infection during the first trimester of pregnancy. But Dr. Baud was one of the doctors who described the establishment of an international registry for pregnancies affected by Covid-19 in an article published this month in the Lancet.
Even when mothers test positive for Covid-19 at delivery, their infants have tended to be negative, Dr. Ratner said, as long as the mothers and babies are kept separate (or well protected by personal protective equipment) after the birth, suggesting that the virus is not being transmitted in utero or at delivery — which was also found to be the case in China.
Dr. Ratner said he had taken care of a number of children with the virus, and “most of them have very mild disease.” But some “have required intensive care and ventilatory support, so there is a wide range, even if most of the cases are OK.”
Some infants become critically ill, but in preschool and school-age children, we have been saying that Covid-19 tends to be very mild. Children with immunodeficiencies or children who have had chemotherapy are at higher risk for serious illness, but, Dr. Ratner said, “we have seen kids without prior medical problems at all who’ve needed admission, who’ve needed intensive care.” This is also the age group where the new multisystem disease is being noted, possibly sometimes as a post-infectious hyperinflammatory process.
Many of the symptoms of this recently described syndrome resemble those of a rare childhood illness called Kawasaki disease. Dr. Jane Newburger, the director of the Kawasaki program at Boston Children’s Hospital, said, “We’re seeing a wave of a syndrome that can include shock or extreme inflammation.” Shock is what happens when the body’s organs don’t get sufficient blood supply, and some of these children have poor heart function.
Kawasaki disease itself is a clinical diagnosis; there is no single lab test that can detect it, and the cause is not known. Dr. Newburger described it as “an acute illness of children that strikes generally children who were previously healthy — high fever for at least four days with red eyes, redness of lips, tongue, throat, a rash, swollen hands and feet, sometimes red palms and soles.” It’s treated with IVIG, intravenous immunoglobulin, a blood product prepared from the serum of many donors with the intent of preventing the rare but serious enlargement of the coronary arteries, which is the most dangerous complication.
Dr. Newburger said that the Covid-19-related cases are a multisystem severe inflammatory syndrome modulated by the immune system, which many people think may appear a few weeks after the initial encounter with the coronavirus. The children come in with high fevers, with dysfunction in one or more body organs, and with lab tests suggesting inflammation.
Dr. Moshe Arditi, the chief of pediatric infectious diseases and immunology at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center, has been working on Kawasaki disease for over 30 years. He said that some of the cases that have been reported in different cities — especially London and New York — may just represent Kawasaki disease in children who have also been exposed to Covid-19, without being able to say whether there is any causal link, while others involve children who are much sicker, with what he described as “a toxic shock kind of syndrome,” needing intensive care — which defines this new clinical entity.
Dr. Philip Kahn, a pediatric rheumatologist at N.Y.U., said he was currently caring for several pediatric patients hospitalized with what looks like Kawasaki disease.
“In Kawasaki disease, the vast majority of children do extremely well, with no long-term bad outcomes,” Dr. Kahn said. “For the vast majority, this is an acute one-time illness of childhood.” And he has seen children with Covid-19 and this Kawasaki-like syndrome who have looked sick but done well, he said, responding to treatment with immunoglobulin. He had just gotten off the phone, he said, with a patient who had been discharged. “The kid is laughing, the mom is laughing, a week and a half later,” he said. “Treated with one dose of immunoglobulin, laughing, looks like a million bucks — that’s the kid I live for.”
And even with the cases of multisystem disease that emerged last week, “compared to adults, children are much less likely to be severely affected, and mortality is very very rare,” Dr. Newburger said. “Parents should still feel it would be very unusual for a child to be so seriously affected — but if their child suddenly becomes very febrile, seems unwell, and a parent’s sixth sense tells them their child is much sicker, seek medical attention, call the pediatrician, go to the hospital.”
“The important takeaway is that this is still a new disease for us,” Dr. Ratner said. “We are still seeing things for the first time, even though over the last few weeks we’ve seen a lot of adults and children.”







Sales of vitamin D to promote immune health have soared, but studies of vitamin D and Covid-19 have yielded mixed results.
In the past decade, studies have found that taking vitamin D can lower the odds of developing respiratory infections like the cold and the flu, especially among people who have documented deficiencies. Now scientists are trying to find out whether vitamin D might also help protect against Covid-19.
Some scientists believe that people with vitamin D deficiencies have weak or abnormal immune responses that make them more susceptible to developing Covid-19 and experiencing severe symptoms. The notion that vitamin D levels could influence the risk of Covid-19 has sparked debate among experts and prompted researchers at Harvard and other universities to start randomized trials examining whether there is a link.
But so far, most of the evidence for the claim comes from observational studies that do not prove causation. And experts are urging people to be cautious about gobbling down high doses of supplements in the hopes of obtaining benefits that may not exist.
The speculation that vitamin D could protect against Covid-19 has been fueled in part by observations that deficiencies are particularly common among groups that have been hit disproportionately hard by the novel coronavirus, such as older adults, nursing home residents, and African-Americans and other minorities. The body synthesizes vitamin D through direct exposure to sunlight, and people who are elderly, homebound or darker skinned tend to produce lower levels of it. Obesity, another risk factor for severe Covid-19, is also associated with low vitamin D levels.
Socioeconomic factors like reduced access to health care and less ability to work from home contribute to the disparate rates of sickness and death from coronavirus among minorities. But some experts point to evidence that low vitamin D levels can hamper the immune system. Vitamin D helps reduce inflammation and can stimulate the release of antimicrobial proteins that kill viruses and bacteria. One team of researchers at Northwestern University released a study, which has not yet been peer reviewed, suggesting that vitamin D could help to quell cytokine storms, a type of immune reaction that appears to worsen outcomes for coronavirus patients.
Another study published in the BMJ in 2017 reviewed data from 25 randomized trials and concluded that people assigned to take vitamin D had a 12 percent lower risk of developing respiratory tract infections compared to those given placebos. But the effect was greater among people who were classified as vitamin D deficient, with very low blood levels, below 25 nanomoles per liter (or 10 nanograms per milliliter): They saw their risk of contracting respiratory infections fall 70 percent when they supplemented with vitamin D. Blood levels of 20 to 50 nanograms per milliliter are generally considered normal.
The study looked at colds, influenza and respiratory infections caused by a variety of viruses. It did not include the novel coronavirus. But it did look at milder infections caused by other strains of coronavirus, said Dr. Adit Ginde, a professor of emergency medicine at the University of Colorado School of Medicine and the study's lead author.
In March, Dr. Tom Frieden, a former director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, wrote an opinion piece suggesting that vitamin D deficiencies could worsen outcomes for people who develop Covid-19 and other respiratory infections. He urged people to avoid deficiencies by spending time outside in the sun, taking supplements, or eating foods rich in vitamin D like fatty fish, egg yolks and fortified milk.
The Institute of Medicine recommends that most adults get 600 international units of vitamin D from food or supplements daily, or 800 IU if they are aged 71 and older, to protect musculoskeletal health. Many experts say that Vitamin D is generally safe at doses up to 2,000 IU a day for those who aren't deficient. The Institute of Medicine classifies 4,000 IU a day as the tolerable upper intake level, meaning that above that threshold there is a greater chance of side effects such as increased calcium in the blood, which can lead to weakness, digestive complaints or kidney problems.
Since the pandemic began, sales of vitamin D and other supplements promoted for immune health have soared. But preliminary studies of vitamin D and Covid-19 have yielded mixed results.
At the University of Chicago Medicine, which serves a largely black and Hispanic population on the South Side of Chicago, researchers reviewed the medical records of more than 4,300 patients, many of them health care workers, who were tested for Covid-19 in March and early April.
After controlling for factors that can influence vitamin D levels, like age, race and chronic medical conditions, they found that people who were vitamin D deficient before the pandemic began were 77 percent more likely to test positive for Covid-19 compared to people who had normal levels.
Dr. David Meltzer, a professor of medicine at the University of Chicago and the lead author of the study, which has not yet been peer reviewed, cautioned that the findings were correlational and did not prove causation. He said he and his colleagues were recruiting local paramedics, police officers and other emergency workers for a randomized trial that will test whether taking low to moderate doses of vitamin D daily has an impact on their risk of developing Covid-19 or the severity of their symptoms. Dr. Meltzer suspects that people taking vitamin D who contract the virus will have fewer symptoms of Covid-19 ''because the immune system will be less likely to have an exaggerated inflammatory response.''
''I think you can learn a lot from observational studies,'' said Dr. Meltzer, who is chief of the Section of Hospital Medicine at the University of Chicago Medicine. ''But in the end we desperately need randomized trials to determine as rapidly as we can if there's a real effect here.''
In Britain people from minority ethnic groups, such as those with African or South Asian ancestry, make up a third of all confirmed cases of Covid-19 in critical care, even though they account for just 14 percent of the population. They also experience higher levels of poverty, chronic diseases and vitamin D deficiencies. At least one medical group, the British Association of Physicians of Indian Origin, has urged all British health care workers from minority backgrounds to consider taking vitamin D supplements as a precaution.
But two recent studies using data from the U.K. Biobank, a long running project that has tracked the health of a half million people aged 40 to 69, cast doubt on the links between vitamin D and Covid-19. One group of researchers found that participants who recently tested positive for coronavirus were more likely to have had very low or deficient levels of vitamin D compared to other participants. But the association disappeared after the results were adjusted for factors like age, race, obesity and socioeconomic status.
The findings suggest that the lower vitamin D levels in people who tested positive for coronavirus were not causally related, said Dr. Claire Hastie, a research associate in public health at the University of Glasgow and the first author of one of the two studies, which was published in the journal Diabetes & Metabolic Syndrome.
''People with lower vitamin D have a higher risk of Covid infection, but it looks like this is explained by other risk factors and not by the vitamin D itself,'' she said. ''Our findings do not support a link between vitamin D concentration and the risk of Covid-19 infection.''
A second analysis led by researchers at the University of Surrey reached similar conclusions. It looked at 580 U.K. Biobank participants who tested positive for coronavirus and found, on average, that their blood levels of vitamin D were ''almost identical'' to 723 participants who tested negative for the virus.
''Mechanistically, there is a link between vitamin D and respiratory tract infections,'' said Dr. Susan Lanham-New, an author of the study and head of the Department of Nutritional Sciences at the University of Surrey. ''But there is nowhere near enough evidence to come out with these claims that Covid-19 is because of vitamin D deficiency.''
Dr. JoAnn Manson, a Harvard Medical School professor and chief of preventive medicine at Brigham and Women's Hospital in Boston, said the lines of evidence linking low vitamin D to Covid-19 were compelling. She is starting a nationwide randomized trial that will test whether assigning people to take vitamin D every day for a month after a positive coronavirus test reduces the severity of their illness. The trial will also look at whether giving vitamin D to other people in their households helps prevent them from developing the infection.
In the meantime, Dr. Manson said people should take simple steps to avoid vitamin D deficiencies, such as being physically active outside while social distancing and eating foods like fortified cereals, fortified dairy, sun-dried mushrooms and fish. For people who cannot get outside or get enough vitamin D from their diets, supplementing with 1,000 to 2,000 IU a day is reasonable, she said. But she urged people not to take high doses.
''More is not necessarily better,'' she said. ''The goal is to avoid a deficiency. It's not to get mega doses.''








When in doubt, look to social factors first, not biology.
More men than women are dying of Covid-19. The numbers are striking. In Italy, men in their 50s died at four times the rate of women in their 50s. Globally, twice as many men than women may be dying of Covid-19.
When a sex difference is observed with some magnitude in deaths across diverse populations, it is commonly assumed that factors in women’s and men’s bodies drive the difference. This assumption has even led some clinicians to experiment with injecting estrogen into men suffering from Covid-19. However, early indicators and past experience with similar diseases suggest that social and other demographic factors, including age, race or ethnicity and class, and comorbidities, not sex, most likely explain a far greater portion of variation in Covid-19 outcomes between women and men. Appreciating the role of these factors is important, because understanding what’s really driving these outcomes helps better target both the research and the public health efforts that can save lives.
As we report this week, emerging Covid-19 data already shows an important role for social context in generating sex disparities. In Connecticut and Massachusetts there is no sex difference in confirmed Covid-19 fatalities, while in New York and Florida, men account for about 60 percent of Covid-19 deaths. Globally, the male-to-female death ratio varies from a staggering 2:1 in the Netherlands to 1:1 in Iran and Canada. It’s too early to say what accounts for these levels of variation; what they do seem to indicate is that sex difference alone isn’t meaningful without incorporating other factors.
During the 1918 Spanish flu pandemic, with which the coronavirus pandemic has been widely compared, men also died in larger numbers in many places. But this wasn’t because of sex alone. It was because of sex and gender-related differences in both occupations — a social variable — and pre-existing health conditions. During the Spanish flu, men in the military and unskilled manual laborers working outside the home died at far higher rates than the general population, probably because they had less freedom to engage in social distancing; it’s noteworthy that nonmilitary and upper-class males perished at rates similar to women overall. For similar social reasons — they were less able to social distance than women — men in 1918 already carried a significantly higher burden of tuberculosis relative to women when the pandemic began. This, when combined with influenza-induced pneumonia, proved deadly.
Covid-19 is similar in important ways to the diseases caused by other recent coronaviruses, such as SARS and MERS. Like Covid-19, SARS and MERS exhibited male-female differences in fatalities. As with Covid-19, this difference was initially claimed as a “sex” difference. But careful analysis showed that gendered behaviors, pre-existing conditions, and gender-segregated occupational exposures explained these sex differences. All signs point to Covid-19 following a comparable pattern.
SARS emerged in early 2003 and quickly reached pandemic levels. Men overall indeed died at a higher rate than women. But a closer inspection of the data soon showed that sex differences varied considerably by age group. At older ages, there was no significant difference between the female and male fatality rates, but younger men died at markedly higher rates than younger women. For instance, in Hong Kong, only 5.9 percent of women ages 35 to 44 died, compared with 15.3 percent of men. Between the ages of 35 and 64, men who developed SARS were 10 percent more likely to die than women.
Taking a cue from these patterns, researchers ran analyses accounting for age, occupation and pre-existing conditions. The results showed that after accounting for these factors, women and men actually had similar fatality rates for SARS for all age groups. The lower fatality rate among women was driven by particularly high infection rates among health care workers, who were predominantly young, healthy and female. So women were both disproportionately likely to be infected and disproportionately likely to survive, compared with men in that age group. Among older women and men, and those with comorbidities such as heart disease, cancer, asthma and liver disease, there was little difference in SARS outcomes. The apparent sex difference was caused by gender-related occupational differences and diseases with complex, often socially rooted causes.
MERS offers an even more clear-cut example. The disease overwhelmingly affected, and continues to affect, older men. Primary transmission from camels remains a key source of infections, and camel handling and slaughtering are predominantly male occupations in Saudi Arabia. As with SARS, a comprehensive study published in 2017 found that fatalities did not differ by sex after accounting for age and pre-existing health status. The sex difference here, in other words, is produced by who is getting infected, not who dies once they’re infected.
A key factor most likely related to male-female differences in Covid-19 fatalities is that men overall are in a poorer state of health than women. In a study examining sex differences in outcomes among Covid-19 patients in China, men were more likely than women to have any comorbidity or two or more of them. Of people with Covid-19 and chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, 83.3 percent were male. Of people with diabetes and cardiovascular disease, 58.9 percent and 62.1 percent, respectively, were male. To be sure, sex-linked biology may play a role in the development of some chronic diseases, but always in complex interaction with class, race or ethnicity, and gender-related variables. Several analyses have already demonstrated that in places where men have higher Covid-19 fatality rates than women, men also, on average, have far higher rates of behaviors such as smoking and comorbidities related to smoking, such as heart disease.
Apaper out this month in The Lancet by researchers at the Harvard T.H. Chan School of Public Health underscores this point. In absolute numbers, men had higher death counts from Covid-19 during the first two weeks of April in Massachusetts. But when adjusted for men’s higher baseline mortality rates by age, researchers found that women and men actually had an identical risk of dying from Covid-19.
A few months into the first wave of the Covid-19 epidemic, men in aggregate appear to have higher fatality rates. But ascribing this outcome to biological sex-related variables, as some have rushed to do, is unlikely to lead to effective interventions. In past epidemics, what at first appeared to be a sex difference turned out to be largely a result of the difference in life experiences between women and men. Occupations, behaviors and pre-existing conditions mattered more than whether one was a woman or a man.
As evidence from this pandemic continues to emerge, we should keep these past lessons in mind. It is possible that some aspect of sex-linked biology contributes to the differences in Covid-19 fatality rates. But framing female-male differences in those rates as driven primarily by innate sex differences distracts researchers, clinicians and policymakers from the far more likely culprits. If gendered behaviors and gender-segregated occupations are responsible for greater Covid-19 vulnerability, we owe it to people of all genders to address these urgent, controllable risk factors.





“I tell the same stories repeatedly; I forget words I know.”
For three months, Chelsea Alionar has struggled with fevers, headaches, dizziness and a brain fog so intense it feels like early dementia. She came down with the worst headache of her life on March 9, then lost her sense of taste and smell. She eventually tested positive for the coronavirus. But her symptoms have been stranger, and lasted longer, than most.
“I tell the same stories repeatedly; I forget words I know,” she told me. Her fingers and toes have been numb, her vision blurry and her fatigue severe. The 37-year-old is a one of the more than 4,000 members of a Facebook support group for Covid survivors who have been ill for more than 80 days.
The more we learn about the coronavirus, the more we realize it’s not just a respiratory infection. The virus can ravage many of the body’s major organ systems, including the brain and central nervous system.
Among patients hospitalized for Covid-19 in Wuhan, China, more than a third experienced nervous system symptoms, including seizures and impaired consciousness. Earlier this month, French researchers reported that 84 percent of Covid patients who had been admitted to the I.C.U. experienced neurological problems, and that 33 percent continued to act confused and disoriented when they were discharged.
According to Dr. Mady Hornig, a psychiatrist and epidemiologist at the Columbia University Mailman School of Public Health, the possibility that neurological issues “will persist and create disability, or difficulties, for individuals downstream is really looking more and more likely.”
Infections have long been implicated in neurological diseases. Syphilis and H.I.V. can induce dementia. Zika is known to invade developing brains and limit their growth, while untreated Lyme disease can cause nerve pain, facial palsy and spinal cord inflammation. One man with SARS developed delirium that progressed into coma, and was found to have the virus in his brain tissue after his death.
Neurologists don’t think that every Covid patient will suffer brain damage — far from it. But the virus may, in effect, injure and thereby age the brain through a number of mechanisms that aren’t yet fully understood.
It’s likely that these brain injuries aren’t that different from other kinds of insults that might accumulate over a person’s lifetime; the problem is that “Covid is a large bolus of these things at once,” said Dr. Majid Fotuhi, a neurologist and neuroscientist affiliated with Johns Hopkins.
Dr. Igor Koralnik agrees. He runs the Neuro Covid-19 Clinic at the Northwestern Memorial Hospital. He expects that when recovered Covid patients go on to develop cognitive issues later in life, “their presentation is going to be worse because of the damage to the brain that was caused by Covid-19.”
How does this happen? Research suggests that the coronavirus can directly infect neural cells, said Dr. Jeffrey Cirillo, a professor of microbial pathogenesis and immunology at Texas A&amp;M University. The virus most likely replicates inside the cells and affects how they function. This viral invasion could cause patients to “have a persistence of cognitive problems, or maybe they will have persistent seizures,” Dr. Koralnik said. In April, a 40-year-old Los Angeles woman with a headache, seizures and hallucinations was found to have the RNA from the coronavirus in her cerebrospinal fluid.
Another way the coronavirus can damage the nervous system is indirectly, through widespread inflammation caused by the body’s immune response. Inflammation “is bad for the brain, and we know that for a fact,” Dr. Fotuhi said. One of the leading theories in Alzheimer’s research is that inflammation drives the disease.
Brain inflammation can also spark the creation of blood clots. Studies suggest that clots occur in up to 30 percent of critically ill Covid patients. These clots can permeate the brain, causing it “to function at a lower level,” Dr. Fotuhi said. They can also lead to strokes that starve the brain of oxygen. Studies from China and Italy have suggested that as many as 5 percent of hospitalized patients with Covid experience strokes, though a more recent N.Y.U. study found the figure to be lower, at 1 percent, in hospitalized New York patients.
If the inflammation becomes so severe as to involve a “cytokine storm,” in which a patient’s body in effect turns on itself, the blood brain barrier can be breached, allowing more viruses and cytokines into the brain and ultimately killing brain cells. “It’s like the defense system is called to quiet a small riot in one neighborhood, and all of a sudden, the whole military is ticked off and they don’t know what’s going on, they just go bomb everything,” Dr. Fotuhi said.
A small number of patients with the coronavirus have gone on to develop Guillain-Barré syndrome, in which a person’s immune system attacks their own nerves, causing paralysis. Michele Hart, a 41-year-old psychotherapist in Colorado, is one of them.
She began experiencing electrical, shocklike pains in her body, numbness in her extremities and stabbing pains down the side of her face in April. She went to the E.R., worried she might have the coronavirus, but they sent her home, saying her neurological symptoms weren’t consistent with the infection. When her blood pressure skyrocketed a few days later, she returned to the ER and this time was given a coronavirus test that came back positive. She was also diagnosed with Guillain-Barré syndrome.
In addition to persistent memory problems and dizziness, she still struggles with nerve pain. “I have pins and needles and shooting nerve pain constantly, as well as burning sensations in my skin,” she told me.
Given all of these concerns, neurologists argue that it is crucial to study Covid patients in order to understand how their nervous systems recover — or don’t. Dr. Cirillo, Dr. Koralnik and Dr. Hornig are all undertaking studies on the topic, but more research will be essential, they say.
“People have been really slow to recognize this,” said Dr. Cirillo, but “we really need to know what the long-term repercussions are, as quickly as possible.” Among other things, research on the topic may be able to identify drugs or other treatments that can be given to Covid patients to reduce the risk of nervous system injury.
Physicians also need to keep in mind that their Covid patients could benefit from cognitive and neurological assessments and prompt neurological treatment. Dr. Fotuhi, for one, believes that all patients hospitalized for the coronavirus should receive brain MRIs to identify nascent issues.
So far during this pandemic, the medical community has largely — and understandably — been focused on keeping Covid patients alive. But we need to consider how the virus could shape the rest of their lives, too.






MUNICH — Dr. Camilla Rothe was about to leave for dinner when the government laboratory called with the surprising test result. Positive. It was Jan. 27. She had just discovered Germany’s first case of the new coronavirus.
But the diagnosis made no sense. Her patient, a businessman from a nearby auto parts company, could have been infected by only one person: a colleague visiting from China. And that colleague should not have been contagious.
The visitor had seemed perfectly healthy during her stay in Germany. No coughing or sneezing, no signs of fatigue or fever during two days of long meetings. She told colleagues that she had started feeling ill after the flight back to China. Days later, she tested positive for the coronavirus.
Scientists at the time believed that only people with symptoms could spread the coronavirus. They assumed it acted like its genetic cousin, SARS.
“People who know much more about coronaviruses than I do were absolutely sure,” recalled Dr. Rothe, an infectious disease specialist at Munich University Hospital.
But if the experts were wrong, if the virus could spread from seemingly healthy carriers or people who had not yet developed symptoms, the ramifications were potentially catastrophic. Public-awareness campaigns, airport screening and stay-home-if-you’re sick policies might not stop it. More aggressive measures might be required — ordering healthy people to wear masks, for instance, or restricting international travel.
Dr. Rothe and her colleagues were among the first to warn the world. But even as evidence accumulated from other scientists, leading health officials expressed unwavering confidence that symptomless spreading was not important.
In the days and weeks to come, politicians, public health officials and rival academics disparaged or ignored the Munich team. Some actively worked to undermine the warnings at a crucial moment, as the disease was spreading unnoticed in French churches, Italian soccer stadiums and Austrian ski bars. A cruise ship, the Diamond Princess, would become a deadly harbinger of symptomless spreading.
Interviews with doctors and public health officials in more than a dozen countries show that for two crucial months — and in the face of mounting genetic evidence — Western health officials and political leaders played down or denied the risk of symptomless spreading. Leading health agencies including the World Health Organization and the European Center for Disease Prevention and Control provided contradictory and sometimes misleading advice. A crucial public health discussion devolved into a semantic debate over what to call infected people without clear symptoms.
The two-month delay was a product of faulty scientific assumptions, academic rivalries and, perhaps most important, a reluctance to accept that containing the virus would take drastic measures. The resistance to emerging evidence was one part of the world’s sluggish response to the virus.
It is impossible to calculate the human toll of that delay, but models suggest that earlier, aggressive action might have saved tens of thousands of lives. Countries like Singapore and Australia, which used testing and contact-tracing and moved swiftly to quarantine seemingly healthy travelers, fared far better than those that did not.
It is now widely accepted that seemingly healthy people can spread the virus, though uncertainty remains over how much they have contributed to the pandemic. Though estimates vary, models using data from Hong Kong, Singapore and China suggest that 30 to 60 percent of spreading occurs when people have no symptoms.
“This was, I think, a very simple truth,” Dr. Rothe said. “I was surprised that it would cause such a storm. I can’t explain it.”
Even now, with more than 9 million cases around the world, and a death toll approaching 500,000, Covid-19 remains an unsolved riddle. It is too soon to know whether the worst has passed, or if a second global wave of infections is about to crash down. But it is clear that an array of countries, from secretive regimes to overconfident democracies, have fumbled their response, misjudged the virus and ignored their own emergency plans.
It is also painfully clear that time was a critical commodity in curbing the virus — and that too much of it was wasted.
‘She Was Not Ill’
On the night of Germany’s first positive test, the virus had seemed far away. Fewer than 100 fatalities had been reported worldwide. Italy, which would become Europe’s ground zero, would not record its first cases for another three days.
A few reports out of China had already suggested the possibility of symptomless spreading. But nobody had proved it could happen.
That night, Dr. Rothe tapped out an email to a few dozen doctors and public health officials.
“Infections can actually be transmitted during the incubation period,” she wrote.
Three more employees from the auto parts company, Webasto, tested positive the following day. Their symptoms were so mild that, normally, it’s likely that none would have been flagged for testing, or have thought to stay at home.
Dr. Rothe decided she had to sound the alarm. Her boss, Dr. Michael Hoelscher, dashed off an email to The New England Journal of Medicine. “We believe that this observation is of utmost importance,” he wrote.
Editors responded immediately. How soon could they see the paper?
The next morning, Jan. 30, public health officials interviewed the Chinese businesswoman by phone. Hospitalized in Shanghai, she explained that she’d started feeling sick on the flight home. Looking back, maybe she’d had some mild aches or fatigue, but she had chalked them up to a long day of travel.
“From her perspective, she was not ill,” said Nadine Schian, a Webasto spokeswoman who was on the call. “She said, ‘OK, I felt tired. But I’ve been in Germany a lot of times before and I always have jet lag.’”
When the health officials described the call, Dr. Rothe and Dr. Hoelscher quickly finished and submitted their article. Dr. Rothe did not talk to the patient herself but said she relied on the health authority summary.
Within hours, it was online. It was a modest clinical observation at a key time. Just days earlier, the World Health Organization had said it needed more information about this very topic.
What the authors did not know, however, was that in a suburb 20 minutes away, another group of doctors had also been rushing to publish a report. Neither knew what the other was working on, a seemingly small academic rift that would have global implications.
Academic Hairsplitting
The second group was made up of officials with the Bavarian health authority and Germany’s national health agency, known as the Robert Koch Institute. Inside a suburban office, doctors unfurled mural paper and traced infection routes using colored pens.
Their team, led by the Bavarian epidemiologist Dr. Merle Böhmer, submitted an article to The Lancet, another premier medical journal. But the Munich hospital group had scooped them by three hours. Dr. Böhmer said her team’s article, which went unpublished as a result, had reached similar conclusions but worded them slightly differently.
Dr. Rothe had written that patients appeared to be contagious before the onset of any symptoms. The government team had written that patients appeared to be contagious before the onset of full symptoms — at a time when symptoms were so mild that people might not even recognize them.
The Chinese woman, for example, had woken up in the middle of the night feeling jet-lagged. Wanting to be sharp for her meetings, she took a Chinese medicine called 999 — containing the equivalent of a Tylenol tablet — and went back to bed.
Perhaps that had masked a mild fever? Perhaps her jet lag was actually fatigue? She had reached for a shawl during a meeting. Maybe that was a sign of chills?
After two lengthy phone calls with the woman, doctors at the Robert Koch Institute were convinced that she had simply failed to recognize her symptoms. They wrote to the editor of The New England Journal of Medicine, casting doubt on Dr. Rothe’s findings.
Editors there decided that the dispute amounted to hairsplitting. If it took a lengthy interview to identify symptoms, how could anyone be expected to do it in the real world?
“The question was whether she had something consistent with Covid-19 or that anyone would have recognized at the time was Covid-19,” said Dr. Eric Rubin, the journal’s editor.
“The answer seemed to be no.”
The journal did not publish the letter. But that would not be the end of it.
That weekend, Andreas Zapf, the head of the Bavarian health authority, called Dr. Hoelscher of the Munich clinic. “Look, the people in Berlin are very angry about your publication,” Dr. Zapf said, according to Dr. Hoelscher.
He suggested changing the wording of Dr. Rothe’s report and replacing her name with those of members of the government task force, Dr. Hoelscher said. He refused.
The health agency would not discuss the phone call.
Until then, Dr. Hoelscher said, their report had seemed straightforward. Now it was clear: “Politically, this was a major, major issue.”
‘A Complete Tsunami’
On Monday, Feb. 3, the journal Science published an article calling Dr. Rothe’s report “flawed.” Science reported that the Robert Koch Institute had written to the New England Journal to dispute her findings and correct an error.
The Robert Koch Institute declined repeated interview requests over several weeks and did not answer written questions.
Dr. Rothe’s report quickly became a symbol of rushed research. Scientists said she should have talked to the Chinese patient herself before publishing, and that the omission had undermined her team’s work. On Twitter, she and her colleagues were disparaged by scientists and armchair experts alike.
“It broke over us like a complete tsunami,” Dr. Hoelscher said.
The controversy also overshadowed another crucial development out of Munich.
The next morning, Dr. Clemens-Martin Wendtner made a startling announcement. Dr. Wendtner was overseeing treatment of Munich’s Covid-19 patients — there were eight now — and had taken swabs from each.
He discovered the virus in the nose and throat at much higher levels, and far earlier, than had been observed in SARS patients. That meant it probably could spread before people knew they were sick.
But the Science story drowned that news out. If Dr. Rothe’s paper had implied that governments might need to do more against Covid-19, the pushback from the Robert Koch Institute was an implicit defense of the conventional thinking.
Sweden’s public health agency declared that Dr. Rothe’s report had contained major errors. The agency’s website said, unequivocally, that “there is no evidence that people are infectious during the incubation period” — an assertion that would remain online in some form for months.
French health officials, too, left no room for debate: “A person is contagious only when symptoms appear,” a government flyer read. “No symptoms = no risk of being contagious.”
As Dr. Rothe and Dr. Hoelscher reeled from the criticism, Japanese doctors were preparing to board the Diamond Princess cruise ship. A former passenger had tested positive for coronavirus.
Yet on the ship, parties continued. The infected passenger had been off the ship for days, after all. And he hadn’t reported symptoms while onboard.
A Semantic Debate
Immediately after Dr. Rothe’s report, the World Health Organization had noted that patients might transmit the virus before showing symptoms. But the organization also underscored a point that it continues to make: Patients with symptoms are the main drivers of the epidemic.
Once the Science article was published, however, the organization waded directly into the debate on Dr. Rothe’s work. On Tuesday, Feb. 4, Dr. Sylvie Briand, the agency’s chief of infectious disease preparedness, tweeted a link to the Science article, calling Dr. Rothe’s report flawed.
With that tweet, the W.H.O. focused on a semantic distinction that would cloud discussion for months: Was the patient asymptomatic, meaning she would never show symptoms? Or pre-symptomatic, meaning she became sick later? Or, even more confusing, oligo-symptomatic, meaning that she had symptoms so mild that she didn’t recognize them?
To some doctors, the focus on these arcane distinctions felt like whistling in the graveyard. A person who feels healthy has no way to know that she is carrying a virus or is about to become sick. Airport temperature checks will not catch these people. Neither will asking them about their symptoms or telling them to stay home when they feel ill.
The W.H.O. later said that the tweet had not been intended as a criticism.
One group paid little attention to this brewing debate: the Munich-area doctors working to contain the cluster at the auto parts company. They spoke daily with potentially sick people, monitoring their symptoms and tracking their contacts.
“For us, it was pretty soon clear that this disease can be transmitted before symptoms,” said Dr. Monika Wirth, who tracked contacts in the nearby county of Fürstenfeldbruck.
Dr. Rothe, though, was shaken. She could not understand why much of the scientific establishment seemed eager to play down the risk.
“All you need is a pair of eyes,” she said. “You don’t need rocket-science virology.”
But she remained confident.
“We will be proven right,” she told Dr. Hoelscher.
That night, Dr. Rothe received an email from Dr. Michael Libman, an infectious-disease specialist in Montreal. He thought that criticism of the paper amounted to semantics. Her paper had convinced him of something: “The disease will most likely eventually spread around the world.”
Political Paralysis
On Feb. 4, Britain’s emergency scientific committee met and, while its experts did not rule out the possibility of symptomless transmission, nobody put much stock in Dr. Rothe’s paper.
“It was very much a hearsay study,” said Wendy Barclay, a virologist and member of the committee, known as the Scientific Advisory Group for Emergencies. “In the absence of real robust epidemiology and tracing, it isn’t obvious until you see the data.”
The data would soon arrive, and from an unexpected source. Dr. Böhmer, from the Bavarian health team, received a startling phone call in the second week of February.
Virologists had discovered a subtle genetic mutation in the infections of two patients from the Munich cluster. They had crossed paths for the briefest of moments, one passing a saltshaker to the other in the company cafeteria, when neither had symptoms. Their shared mutation made it clear that one had infected the other.
Dr. Böhmer had been skeptical of symptomless spreading. But now, there was no doubt: “It can only be explained with pre-symptomatic transmission,” Dr. Böhmer said.
Now it was Dr. Böhmer who sounded the alarm. She said she promptly shared the finding, and its significance, with the W.H.O. and the European Center for Disease Prevention and Control.
Neither organization included the discovery in its regular reports.
A week after receiving Dr. Böhmer’s information, European health officials were still declaring: “We are still unsure whether mild or asymptomatic cases can transmit the virus.” There was no mention of the genetic evidence.
W.H.O. officials say the genetic discovery informed their thinking, but they made no announcement of it. European health officials say the German information was one early piece of an emerging picture that they were still piecing together.
The doctors in Munich were increasingly frustrated and confused by the World Health Organization. First, the group wrongly credited the Chinese government with alerting the German authorities to the first infection. Government officials and doctors say the auto parts company itself sounded the alarm.
Then, the World Health Organization’s emergency director, Dr. Michael Ryan, said on Feb. 27 that the significance of symptomless spreading was becoming a myth. And Dr. Maria Van Kerkhove, the organization’s technical lead on coronavirus response, suggested it was nothing to worry about.
“It’s rare but possible,” she said. “It’s very rare.”
The agency still maintains that people who cough or sneeze are more contagious than people who don’t. But there is no scientific consensus on how significant this difference is or how it affects the spread of virus.
And so, with evidence mounting, the Munich team could not understand how the W.H.O. could be so sure that symptomless spreading was insignificant.
“At this point, for us it was clear,” said Dr. Wendtner, the senior doctor overseeing treatment of the Covid-19 patients. “This was a misleading statement by the W.HO.”
‘If This Is True, We’re in Trouble’
The Munich cluster was not the only warning.
The Chinese health authorities had explicitly cautioned that patients were contagious before showing symptoms. A Japanese bus driver was infected while transporting seemingly healthy tourists from Wuhan.
And by the middle of February, 355 people aboard the Diamond Princess cruise ship had tested positive. About a third of the infected passengers and staff had no symptoms.
But public health officials saw danger in promoting the risk of silent spreaders. If quarantining sick people and tracing their contacts could not reliably contain the disease, governments might abandon those efforts altogether.
In Sweden and Britain, for example, discussion swirled about enduring the epidemic until the population obtained “herd immunity.” Public health officials worried that might lead to overwhelmed hospitals and needless deaths.
Plus, preventing silent spreading required aggressive, widespread testing that was then impossible for most countries.
“It’s not like we had some easy alternative,” said Dr. Libman, the Canadian doctor. “The message was basically: ‘If this is true, we’re in trouble.’”
European health officials say they were reluctant to acknowledge silent spreading because the evidence was trickling in and the consequences of a false alarm would have been severe. “These reports are seen everywhere, all over the world,” said Dr. Josep Jansa, a senior European Union health official. “Whatever we put out, there’s no way back.”
Looking back, health officials should have said that, yes, symptomless spreading was happening and they did not understand how prevalent it was, said Dr. Agoritsa Baka, a senior European Union doctor.
But doing that, she said, would have amounted to an implicit warning to countries: What you’re doing might not be enough.
‘Stop Buying Masks!’
While public health officials hesitated, some doctors acted. At a conference in Seattle in mid-February, Jeffrey Shaman, a Columbia University professor, said his research suggested that Covid-19’s rapid spread could only be explained if there were infectious patients with unremarkable symptoms or no symptoms at all.
In the audience that day was Steven Chu, the Nobel-winning physicist and former U.S. energy secretary. “If left to its own devices, this disease will spread through the whole population,” he remembers Professor Shaman warning.
Afterward, Dr. Chu began insisting that healthy colleagues at his Stanford University laboratory wear masks. Doctors in Cambridge, England, concluded that asymptomatic transmission was a big source of infection and advised local health workers and patients to wear masks, well before the British government acknowledged the risk of silent spreaders.
The American authorities, faced with a shortage, actively discouraged the public from buying masks. “Seriously people — STOP BUYING MASKS!” Surgeon General Jerome M. Adams tweeted on Feb. 29.
By early March, while the World Health Organization continued pressing the case that symptom-free transmission was rare, science was breaking in the other direction.
Researchers in Hong Kong estimated that 44 percent of Covid-19 transmission occurred before symptoms began, an estimate that was in line with a British study that put that number as high as 50 percent.
The Hong Kong study concluded that people became infectious about two days before their illness emerged, with a peak on their first day of symptoms. By the time patients felt the first headache or scratch in the throat, they might have been spreading the disease for days.
In Belgium, doctors saw that math in action, as Covid-19 tore through nursing homes, killing nearly 5,000 people.
“We thought that by monitoring symptoms and asking sick people to stay at home, we would be able to manage the spread,” said Steven Van Gucht, the head of Belgium’s Covid-19 scientific committee. “It came in through people with hardly any symptoms.”
More than 700 people aboard the Diamond Princess were sickened. Fourteen died. Researchers estimate that most of the infection occurred early on, while seemingly healthy passengers socialized and partied.
Government scientists in Britain concluded in late April that 5 to 6 percent of symptomless health care workers were infected and might have been spreading the virus.
In Munich, Dr. Hoelscher has asked himself many times whether things would have been different if world leaders had taken the issue seriously earlier. He compared their response to a rabbit stumbling upon a poisonous snake.
“We were watching that snake and were somehow paralyzed,” he said.
Acceptance. Or Not.
As the research coalesced in March, European health officials were convinced.
“OK, this is really a big issue,” Dr. Baka recalled thinking. “It plays a big role in the transmission.”
By the end of the month, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control announced it was rethinking its policy on masks. It concluded that up to 25 percent of patients might have no symptoms.
Since then, the C.D.C., governments around the world and, finally, the World Health Organization have recommended that people wear masks in public.
Still, the W.H.O. is sending confusing signals. Earlier this month, Dr. Van Kerkhove, the technical lead, repeated that transmission from asymptomatic patients was “very rare.” After an outcry from doctors, the agency said there had been a misunderstanding.
“In all honesty, we don’t have a clear picture on this yet,” Dr. Van Kerkhove said. She said she had been referring to a few studies showing limited transmission from asymptomatic patients.
Recent internet ads confused the matter even more. A Google search in mid-June for studies on asymptomatic transmission returned a W.H.O. advertisement titled: “People With No Symptoms — Rarely Spread Coronavirus.”
Clicking on the link, however, offered a much more nuanced picture: “Some reports have indicated that people with no symptoms can transmit the virus. It is not yet known how often it happens.”
After The Times asked about those discrepancies, the organization removed the advertisements.
Back in Munich, there is little doubt left. Dr. Böhmer, the Bavarian government doctor, published a study in The Lancet last month that relied on extensive interviews and genetic information to methodically track every case in the cluster.
In the months after Dr. Rothe swabbed her first patient, 16 infected people were identified and caught early. All survived. Aggressive testing and flawless contact-tracing contained the spread.
Dr. Böhmer’s study found “substantial” transmission from people with no symptoms or exceptionally mild, nonspecific symptoms.
Dr. Rothe and her colleagues got a footnote.





Many among the most ill may emerge with debilitating infirmities that will present major challenges in care.
The surge of Covid-19 patients is declining in New York and several other cities, but in its wake, another surge is underway. Many Covid-19 survivors are suffering serious medical problems that will continue to tax the resources of hospitals, rehabilitation centers and other medical providers.
Over the next weeks and months, these patients will tell us what “survival” from Covid-19 really means. We have plenty of data on rates of death versus survival from the coronavirus, but not much on the quality of survival. But what we do know from the limited data about survivors of Covid-19, and about how ventilated and critically ill patients fare after spending weeks in intensive-care units, raises significant concerns.
These patients often end up on ventilators, in which a tube is inserted into the mouth and down into the airway. Imagine a tongue depressor thrust down your mouth 24/7 for a week. Patients are sedated on medications because of the discomfort and to stabilize their breathing.
They can’t move or eat. Their muscles atrophy. About 90 percent of Covid-19 patients on ventilators develop acute kidney injury, with about a quarter needing renal replacement therapy such as dialysis, according to early studies.
Making matters worse, patients who end up in intensive care units for extended periods often develop post-intensive-care syndrome, which can include cognitive, muscular and neurological problems, as well as PTSD. These problems can persist for months and even years. In Britain, as of mid-May, about a thirdof Covid-19 patients in I.C.U.s were still there after 20 days, putting them at high risk for these conditions.
And many of these patients will develop acute respiratory distress syndrome, in which fluid builds up in the tiny air sacs of the lungs, reducing the oxygen that gets into the bloodstream and to the organs. At discharge, almost all ARDS patients have significant neuro-cognitive deficits, including impaired memory, attention and concentration (the result, for instance, of low oxygen levels).
These problems can still be found in up to 20 percent of these patients five years later, according to a 2016 article in the journal Intensive Care Medicine. Depression and PTSD were also prevalent.
It’s not a stretch to conclude, therefore, that many of these Covid-19 patients are likely to emerge with debilitating infirmities that will present major challenges in care, even as we brace for a possible resurgence of the coronavirus later this year in an economy that has been laid low by it.
In a recent article on the blog of the journal Health Affairs, three public health experts at Harvard estimated that assuming 40 percent of the country is infected over the course of the pandemic, more than 20 million Americans will be hospitalized and nearly 4.5 million will require intensive care.
How many will suffer from these chronic, disabling conditions that fall into what I call post-Covid-19 syndrome, requiring continued care and rehab in health care facilities or at home, is unknown. One of the shortcomings of the nation’s public health response to the pandemic — on top of the lack of adequate testing and contact tracing — has been its failure to collect and synthesize sufficient data to help us prepare to care for these patients. But from what we do know, their number is likely to be significant.
How will we deal with them?
Usually, hospitals try to discharge them to longer-term rehabilitation centers, long-term acute-care hospitals or nursing homes, but these institutions have limited capacity and often don’t want to accept Covid-19 patients, who may still be infectious.
That’s why, increasingly, some of these patients remain in hospitals, using resources that could be used for other Covid-19 patients or people who have cancer, diabetes or other serious diseases but have had to postpone treatment because of the pandemic.
Others who are being sent home may have significant physical or cognitive impairments, preventing them from working or caring for themselves.
The needs of Covid-19 survivors have received little attention and must be addressed. We are simply not prepared to handle them. Families are often unaware of the burdens they will face, and they will need assistance.
Vulnerable populations who have had difficulty getting health care, including many African-Americans, as well as the uninsured, poor, homeless, undocumented and mentally ill, will face added obstacles. New federal funding to help hospitals and others cover the costs of treating Covid-19 may not be enough.
Many politicians and others delayed responding to the pandemic, hoping that it was a myth or that if we simply ignored it, it would go away.
We should not make that mistake again.
